Florida, session 2026, SB104.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âSection 7.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to 28 read: 29 7.03âBay County.âThe boundary lines of Bay County are as 30 follows: Beginning at the southwest corner of section eighteen 31 in township two, north, range eleven, west; thence west on the 32 section line to the southwest corner of section eighteen in 33 township two, north, range twelve, west; thence south on the 34 range line dividing ranges twelve and thirteen, west, to the 35 Meridian base line; thence west on the base line to the thread 36 of Pine Log Creek in range sixteen, west; thence southwesterly 37 along the thread of said creek into the Choctawhatchee River to 38 the thread of said river; thence southwesterly along the thread 39 of said river to a point where said river intersects the range 40 line dividing ranges seventeen and eighteen, west; thence south 41 on said range line to the Gulf of America; thence in a 42 southeasterly southeastwardly direction following the 43 meanderings of said gulf, including the waters of said gulf 44 within the jurisdiction of the State of Florida, including all 45 islands opposite the shoreline to a point where range line 46 dividing ranges eleven and twelve, west, intersects with said 47 gulf; thence north on said range line to place of beginning. 48 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to the preferred form of 49 directional terms used in Florida Statutes. 50 Section 2.âSection 7.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to 51 read: 52 7.05âBrevard County.âThe boundary lines of Brevard County 53 are as follows: Beginning in the thread of the St. Johns River 54 where the line dividing townships twenty-one and twenty-two 55 south, intersects said river; thence east on said township line 56 to the range line dividing ranges thirty-three and thirty-four 57 east; thence north on said range line to where the same 58 intersects the line dividing townships nineteen and twenty 59 south; thence east on said township line to the Atlantic Ocean; 60 thence southward along the Atlantic coast, including the waters 61 of the Atlantic Ocean within the jurisdiction of Florida, to the 62 intersection with the centerline of the Sebastian Inlet produced 63 easterly eastwardly, said inlet being in section twenty of 64 township thirty south range thirty-nine east; thence westerly on 65 said centerline and continuing southwesterly along the 66 centerline of the approach channel to said inlet from the Indian 67 River to a point due east of the mouth of the St. Sebastian 68 River; thence due west to the mouth of the St. Sebastian River; 69 thence south along the thread of the St. Sebastian River and the 70 thread of the south fork of the St. Sebastian River to a point 71 where the line dividing townships thirty and thirty-one south 72 intersects the thread of said south fork; thence west on said 73 township line to the line dividing ranges thirty-four and 74 thirty-five east; thence north on said range line to the 75 northeast corner of township twenty-five south, range thirty 76 four east and the St. Johns River; thence northerly following 77 the thread of said river to the point of beginning. 78 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to the preferred form of 79 directional terms used in Florida Statutes. 80 Section 3.âSection 7.16, Florida Statutes, is amended to 81 read: 82 7.16âDuval County.âThe boundary lines of Duval County are 83 as follows: Beginning at the mouth of the Nassau River; thence 84 up the thread of the main stream of said river to the run of 85 Thomas Swamp; thence up the run of said swamp to where same 86 would intersect the prolongation of a line drawn from the 87 southwest corner of township one north, of range twenty-five 88 east, to the southwest corner of township two south, of range 89 twenty-three east; thence on said last-mentioned line in a 90 southwesterly direction to where its extension would intersect 91 the range line dividing ranges twenty-two and twenty-three east; 92 thence south on said range line, concurrent with the Baker 93 County line, to the dividing line between townships three and 94 four south; thence east on said township line, concurrent with 95 the north boundary of Clay County, to its intersection with the 96 easterly limited access right-of-way line of U.S. 17, said point 97 being located south 88Â°33â²33â³ west 2.37 feet of the southwest 98 corner of Lot 12, Block 11 of Island View Subdivision, according 99 to the plat thereof recorded in Plat Book 6, page 10, Public 100 Records of Duval County, Florida; thence, along the limited 101 access boundary of State Road 9-A, north 08Â°45â²26â³ east 119.74 102 feet; thence north 38Â°21â²40â³ east 165.23 feet; thence north 103 49Â°31â²32â³ east 101.97 feet, thence north 64Â°29â²41â³ east 145.12 104 feet; thence north 83Â°23â²50â³ east 290.48 feet to the beginning 105 of a curve concave to the south and having a radius of 22,768.31 106 feet; thence, from a tangent bearing of south 89Â°51â²51â³ east, 107 run easterly 1,466.89 feet along said curve through a central 108 angle of 03Â°41â²29â³ to the end of said curve; thence south 109 86Â°10â²22â³ east 891.45 feet; thence south 86Â°49â²27â³ east 228.51 110 feet; thence north 87Â°54â²15â³ east 816.30 feet, thence south 111 86Â°49â²27â³ east, to the west margin of the main channel of the 112 St. Johns River; thence southerly along the west margin of the 113 main channel of said river, concurrent with the east boundary of 114 Clay County, to a point where a line drawn due west from the 115 mouth of Julington Creek would intersect said western margin of 116 the main channel of the St. Johns River; thence, concurrent with 117 the north boundary of St. Johns County, due east to the mouth of 118 Julington Creek; thence along the thread of said Julington Creek 119 to the south bank of Durbin Creek; thence easterly eastwardly 120 along the south bank of said Durbin Creek to a point where the 121 range line dividing ranges twenty-seven and twenty-eight east 122 intersects said south bank; thence south on said range line to 123 the southwest corner of township four south, range twenty-eight 124 east; thence east on the township line dividing townships four 125 and five south to the southeast corner of township four south, 126 range twenty-eight east; thence north on twenty-nine east to a 127 point where an extension of the section line between sections 128 eight and seventeen and sections nine and sixteen, township 129 three south, range twenty-nine east, would intersect said 130 section line; thence east on said section line to the Atlantic 131 Ocean; thence northward along the Atlantic coast, including the 132 waters of said ocean within the jurisdiction of the State of 133 Florida, to the point of beginning. Excluding from Duval County 134 the following described parcel of land. Begin at the 135 intersection of the north line of township four south with the 136 easterly right-of-way line of State Road 21, also known as 137 Blanding Boulevard, said east right-of-way line bearing north 138 00Â°02â²42â³ west; thence north 52Â°48â²22â³ east 2,239.0 feet; thence 139 north 40Â°33â²35â³ west 301.54 feet; thence north 24Â°10â²22â³ east 140 40.18 feet to an intersection with the southerly limited access 141 right-of-way line of State Road 9-A, also known as Interstate 142 295; thence along the southerly and easterly right-of-way line 143 of said State Road 9-A the following 6 courses; thence south 144 66Â°10â²44â³ east 1,883.20 feet to the point of curvature of a 145 curve concave northerly and having a radius of 5,879.578 feet; 146 thence southeasterly 2,592.53 feet along and around said curve 147 through a central angle of 25Â°15â²50â³ to the point of tangency of 148 said curve; thence north 88Â°33â²33â³ east 3,540.04 feet; thence 149 south 78Â°13â²41â³ east 219.09 feet; thence south 61Â°03â²20â³ east 150 233.15 feet; thence south 52Â°38â²29â³ east 379.68 feet to an 151 intersection with the northerly line of said township four 152 south; thence departing said right-of-way line, run thence west 153 along said north line of township four south to the point of 154 beginning. 155 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to the preferred form of 156 directional terms used in Florida Statutes. 157 Section 4.âSection 7.38, Florida Statutes, is amended to 158 read: 159 7.38âLevy County.âThe boundary lines of Levy County are as 160 follows: Beginning at the mouth of the most southern outlet of 161 the Big Withlacoochee River, running in an easterly eastwardly 162 direction, including all the islands in the mouth of said river, 163 along the thread of said river to where the range line dividing 164 ranges seventeen and eighteen east intersects said river; thence 165 north on said range line to the township line between townships 166 fourteen and fifteen south; thence east on said township line to 167 the middle line of township fourteen south, range nineteen east; 168 thence north on said middle line to the township line between 169 townships eleven and twelve south; thence west on said township 170 line to the range line between ranges seventeen and eighteen 171 east; thence north on said range line to the northeast corner of 172 section thirteen, township eleven south, range seventeen east; 173 thence west on the north line of said section thirteen and other 174 sections to the range line between ranges sixteen and seventeen 175 east; thence north on said range line to the township line 176 between townships ten and eleven south; thence west on said 177 township line to the range line between ranges fifteen and 178 sixteen east; thence north on said range line to the northeast 179 corner of section thirty-six, township ten south, range fifteen 180 east; thence west on the north boundary of said section thirty 181 six to the northwest corner of said section thirty-six, thence 182 north one half mile to the middle line of section twenty-six, 183 township ten south, range fifteen east; thence west on the 184 middle line of said section twenty-six and other sections to the 185 range line between ranges fourteen and fifteen east; thence 186 north to the northeast corner of section twenty-five, township 187 ten south, range fourteen east; thence west on the north line of 188 said section twenty-five and other sections to the thread of the 189 Suwannee River; thence southerly along the thread of the main 190 stream of said river to its mouth; thence south and easterly 191 along the Gulf of America, including all the islands, keys, and 192 the waters of said gulf within the jurisdiction of the State of 193 Florida, to the point of beginning. 194 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to the preferred form of 195 directional terms used in Florida Statutes. 196 Section 5.âSection 7.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to 197 read: 198 7.42âMarion County.âThe boundary lines of Marion County are 199 as follows: Beginning in the thread of the Withlacoochee River, 200 at the range line dividing ranges seventeen and eighteen east; 201 thence north to the township line dividing townships fourteen 202 and fifteen south; thence east on said township line to the 203 middle of township fourteen south, range nineteen east; thence 204 north to the line dividing townships eleven and twelve south; 205 thence east on said township line to Orange Lake; thence down 206 said lake along its southern margin to Orange Creek; thence 207 northerly and easterly down the thread of said creek to its 208 junction with the Oklawaha River; thence northeasterly down the 209 south side of the Oklawaha River at low-water mark to a point on 210 the south side of the Oklawaha River at low-water mark, where 211 the range line dividing ranges twenty-four and twenty-five east 212 in township eleven south, crosses said river; thence south on 213 said range line to where it intersects the township line 214 dividing townships eleven and twelve south; thence east on said 215 township line to where it intersects the section line dividing 216 sections two and three, in township twelve south, of range 217 twenty-five east; thence south on said section line and other 218 section lines to the southwest corner of section twenty-three of 219 said township twelve south, of range twenty-five east; thence 220 east on the section line dividing sections twenty-three and 221 twenty-six and other section lines to the range line dividing 222 ranges twenty-five and twenty-six east; thence south on said 223 range line to the southwest corner of section seven, township 224 thirteen south, range twenty-six east; thence east on the 225 section line dividing sections seven and eighteen, township 226 thirteen south, range twenty-six east, and other section lines 227 to the west shore of Lake George; thence southerly southwardly 228 along the shore of Lake George to the mouth of Sulphur Spring; 229 thence along the western bank of Lake George until it arrives at 230 range line dividing ranges twenty-six and twenty-seven east; 231 thence south on said range line to township line dividing 232 townships seventeen and eighteen south; thence due west on the 233 said township line to the thread of the Withlacoochee River; 234 thence northwesterly down the thread of said last mentioned 235 river to the place of beginning. 236 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to the preferred form of 237 directional terms used in Florida Statutes. 238 Section 6.âSection 7.54, Florida Statutes, is amended to 239 read: 240 7.54âPutnam County.âThe boundary lines of Putnam County are 241 as follows: Beginning at a point on the south side of the 242 Oklawaha River at low watermark where the range line dividing 243 ranges twenty-four and twenty-five east, township eleven south, 244 crosses said river; thence south on said range line to where 245 same intersects the township line dividing townships eleven and 246 twelve south; thence east on said township line to where same 247 intersects the section line dividing sections two and three, 248 township twelve south, range twenty-five east; thence south on 249 said section line and other section lines to the southwest 250 corner of section twenty-three of said township twelve south, 251 range twenty-five east; thence east on the section line dividing 252 sections twenty-three and twenty-six and other sections to the 253 range line dividing ranges twenty-five and twenty-six east; 254 thence south on said range line to the southwest corner of 255 section seven, township thirteen south, range twenty-six east; 256 thence east on the south boundary of said section seven and 257 other sections to the west shore of Lake George; thence 258 southerly southwardly along the shore of Lake George to the 259 mouth of Sulphur Spring; thence to a point on Lake George south 260 of the Spanish Grant, known as the Acosta Grant of land, and on 261 the northern boundary of Volusia County; thence in a direct line 262 and along the northern boundary of Volusia County to the most 263 southern part of Crescent Lake; thence along said northern 264 boundary of Volusia County, following the southeast shore of 265 Crescent Lake, to the mouth of Haw Creek and the boundary of 266 Flagler County; thence westerly and then northerly northwardly 267 along the boundary of Flagler County through the middle of 268 Crescent Lake crossing Bear Island on a line easterly of and 269 parallel to the west line of section nineteen, township twelve 270 south, range twenty-eight east, said line being 10,280 feet 271 easterly, measured at right angles from said west line of 272 section nineteen, which line crosses approximately in the center 273 of Bear Island, then continuing north and westerly through the 274 middle of Crescent Lake, to the range line dividing ranges 275 twenty-seven and twenty-eight east; thence north on said range 276 line to its intersection with Deep Creek; thence west along the 277 center of Deep Creek to the mouth thereof; thence due west to 278 the west margin of the main channel of the St. Johns River; 279 thence northerly along the west margin of the main channel of 280 said river to the intersection of the south boundary line of 281 township seven south with said river; thence west on said 282 township line to its intersection with the north margin of the 283 Bellamy or federal road leading from St. Augustine to 284 Tallahassee; thence south and westerly along the north margin of 285 said road to the point of intersection with such margin of a 286 northerly extension of the east boundary line of Hillcrest on 287 the Lake, a subdivision, as same appears of record in Plat Book 288 2, page 52, Public Records of Clay County; thence south along 289 the east boundary line of such subdivision to the southeast 290 corner of such subdivision; thence west along the south boundary 291 line of such subdivision to a point intersecting the north 292 margin of the Bellamy Road; thence south and westerly along the 293 north margin of said road to where same intersects the north 294 boundary of section seventeen, township nine south, range 295 twenty-three east; thence west on the section line between 296 sections eight and seventeen, seven and eighteen, township nine 297 south, range twenty-three east, to the southeast corner of said 298 section seven; thence continue west on the section line between 299 sections twelve and thirteen, township nine south, range twenty 300 two east to Santa Fe Lake; thence in a southeasterly direction 301 to a point on the range line dividing ranges twenty-two and 302 twenty-three east where said range line is intersected by the 303 Bellamy Road; thence south on said range line to where the same 304 intersects the thread of Orange Creek; thence westerly along the 305 thread of said creek to the intersection of same with the 306 Oklawaha River; thence westerly along the south bank of said 307 river at low watermark to the place of beginning. 308 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to the preferred form of 309 directional terms used in Florida Statutes. 310 Section 7.âSection 7.58, Florida Statutes, is amended to 311 read: 312 7.58âSt. Johns County.âThe boundary lines of St. Johns 313 County are as follows: Beginning at a point on the Atlantic 314 coast, at a point where the section line between ten and 315 fifteen, in township three south of range twenty-nine east, 316 intersects the said Atlantic coast; thence west on the said 317 section line to a point where said section line would intersect 318 the range line between ranges twenty-eight and twenty-nine east; 319 thence south on said range line to a point where said range line 320 intersects the township line between townships four and five 321 south; thence west on the township line between townships four 322 and five south, in range twenty-eight east, to a point where 323 said township line intersects the range line between ranges 324 twenty-seven and twenty-eight east; thence north on said range 325 line to where the same intersects Durbin Creek; thence along the 326 south bank of Durbin Creek to Julington Creek; thence along the 327 thread of Julington Creek to the mouth thereof; thence due west 328 to the west margin of the main channel of the St. Johns River 329 and boundary line of Clay County; thence southerly southwardly 330 along the west margin of the main channel of said river and 331 boundaries of Clay and Putnam Counties to a point due west of 332 the mouth of Deep Creek; thence due east to the mouth of Deep 333 Creek; thence up the center of Deep Creek to the point of 334 intersection of Deep Creek with the range lines between ranges 335 twenty-seven and twenty-eight east; thence south on said range 336 line to a point where the south boundary line of section 337 eighteen, in township ten south, range twenty-eight east, 338 intersects said range line; thence east on said section line to 339 the range line between ranges twenty-nine and thirty east; 340 thence north on said range line to the middle of Pellicerâs 341 Creek; thence easterly on an imaginary line down the middle of 342 said creek to the mouth of said creek; thence northeasterly on 343 an imaginary line extending from the mouth of Pellicerâs Creek 344 to a point on the extension of township line between townships 345 nine and ten south, range thirty-one east and immediately north 346 of Summer Haven on the Atlantic coast; thence northerly 347 northwardly along said Atlantic coast, including the waters of 348 the Atlantic Ocean within the jurisdiction of the State of 349 Florida, to place of beginning. 350 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to the preferred form of 351 directional terms used in Florida Statutes. 352 Section 8.âSection 7.66, Florida Statutes, is amended to 353 read: 354 7.66âWalton County.âThe boundary lines of Walton County are 355 as follows: Beginning on the Alabama state line where same is 356 intersected by the line dividing centrally range eighteen west; 357 thence south on the section lines to the line dividing townships 358 two and three north, in range eighteen west; thence east to the 359 Choctawhatchee River; thence down the thread of the 360 Choctawhatchee River to a point where said Choctawhatchee River 361 intersects the range line dividing ranges seventeen and eighteen 362 west; thence south on said range line to the Gulf of America; 363 thence in a westerly westwardly direction following the 364 meanderings of said gulf, including the waters of said gulf 365 within the jurisdiction of the State of Florida, to the range 366 line dividing ranges twenty-one and twenty-two west; thence 367 north on said line to the dividing line between Florida and 368 Alabama; thence easterly along said state line to the place of 369 beginning. 370 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to the preferred form of 371 directional terms used in Florida Statutes. 372 Section 9.âSubsection (3) of section 82.036, Florida 373 Statutes, is amended to read: 374 82.036âLimited alternative remedy to remove unauthorized 375 persons from residential real property.â 376 (3)âTo request the immediate removal of an unlawful 377 occupant of a residential dwelling, the property owner or his or 378 her authorized agent must submit a complaint by presenting a 379 completed and verified Complaint to Remove Persons Unlawfully 380 Occupying Residential Real Property to the sheriff of the county 381 in which the real property is located. The submitted complaint 382 must be in substantially the following form: 383 384 COMPLAINT TO REMOVE PERSONS UNLAWFULLY 385 OCCUPYING RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY 386 387 I, the owner or authorized agent of the owner of the real 388 property located at ...(address of property)... ........, 389 declare under the penalty of perjury that (initial each box): 390 1.â.... I am the owner of the real property or the 391 authorized agent of the owner of the real property. 392 2.â.... I purchased the property on ...(date of 393 purchase)... ..... 394 3.â.... The real property is a residential dwelling. 395 4.â.... An unauthorized person or persons have unlawfully 396 entered and are remaining or residing unlawfully on the real 397 property. 398 5.â.... The real property was not open to members of the 399 public at the time the unauthorized person or persons entered. 400 6.â.... I have directed the unauthorized person or persons 401 to leave the real property, but they have not done so. 402 7.â.... The person or persons are not current or former 403 tenants pursuant to any valid lease authorized by the property 404 owner, and any lease that may be produced by an occupant is 405 fraudulent. 406 8.â.... The unauthorized person or persons sought to be 407 removed are not an owner or a co-owner of the property and have 408 not been listed on the title to the property unless the person 409 or persons have engaged in title fraud. 410 9.â.... The unauthorized person or persons are not 411 immediate family members of the property owner. 412 10.â.... There is no litigation related to the real 413 property pending between the property owner and any person 414 sought to be removed. 415 11.â.... I understand that a person or persons removed from 416 the property pursuant to this procedure may bring a cause of 417 action against me for any false statements made in this 418 complaint, or for wrongfully using this procedure, and that as a 419 result of such action I may be held liable for actual damages, 420 penalties, costs, and reasonable attorney fees. 421 12.â.... I am requesting the sheriff to immediately remove 422 the unauthorized person or persons from the residential 423 property. I authorize the sheriff to enter the property using 424 reasonably necessary force, to search the property, and to 425 remove any unauthorized person or persons. 426 13.â.... A copy of my valid government-issued 427 identification is attached, or I am an agent of the property 428 owner, and documents evidencing my authority to act on the 429 property ownerâs behalf are attached. 430 431 I HAVE READ EVERY STATEMENT MADE IN THIS PETITION AND EACH 432 STATEMENT IS TRUE AND CORRECT. I UNDERSTAND THAT THE STATEMENTS 433 MADE IN THIS PETITION ARE BEING MADE UNDER PENALTY OF PERJURY, 434 PUNISHABLE AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 92.525, FLORIDA STATUTES. 435 436 ...(Signature of Property Owner or Agent of Owner)... 437 438 Reviserâs note.âAmended conform to general style in forms. 439 Section 10.âParagraph (c) of subsection (4) of section 440 100.371, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 441 100.371âInitiatives; procedure for placement on ballot.â 442 (4) 443 (c)âAn application for registration must be submitted in 444 the format required by the Secretary of State and must include 445 the following: 446 1.âThe information required to be on the petition form 447 under s. 101.161, including the ballot summary and title as 448 received by the Secretary of State. 449 2.âThe applicantâs name, permanent address, temporary 450 address, if applicable, date of birth, Florida driver license or 451 Florida identification card number, and the last four digits of 452 his or her social security number. 453 3.âAn address in this state at which the applicant will 454 accept service of process related to disputes concerning the 455 petition process. 456 4.âA statement that the applicant consents to the 457 jurisdiction of the courts of this state in resolving disputes 458 concerning the petition process. 459 5.âAny information required by the Secretary of State to 460 verify the applicantâs identity or address. 461 6.âWhether the applicant has been convicted of a felony 462 violation and has not had his or her right to vote restored, by 463 including the statement, âI affirm that I am not a convicted 464 felon, or, if I am, my right to vote has been restored,â and 465 providing a box for the applicant to check to affirm the 466 statement. 467 7.âWhether the applicant is a citizen of the United States, 468 by asking the question, âAre you a citizen of the United States 469 of America?â and providing boxes for the applicant to check 470 whether the applicant is or is not a citizen of the United 471 States. 472 8.âWhether the applicant is a Florida resident by asking 473 the question, âAre you a resident of the State of Florida?â and 474 providing boxes for the applicant to check whether the applicant 475 is or is not a resident of the State of Florida. 476 9.âThe signature of the applicant under penalty of perjury 477 for false swearing pursuant to s. 104.011, by which the 478 applicant swears or affirms that the information contained in 479 the application is true. 480 Reviserâs note.âAmended to remove extraneous punctuation. 481 Section 11.âParagraph (h) of subsection (2) of section 482 112.19, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 483 112.19âLaw enforcement, correctional, and correctional 484 probation officers; death benefits.â 485 (2) 486 (h)1.âAny employer who employs a full-time law enforcement, 487 correctional, or correctional probation officer who, on or after 488 January 1, 1995, suffers a catastrophic injury, as defined in s. 489 440.02, Florida Statutes 2002, in the line of duty shall pay the 490 entire premium of the employerâs health insurance plan for the 491 injured employee, for the injured employeeâs spouse, and for 492 each dependent child of the injured employee until the child 493 reaches the age of majority or until the end of the calendar 494 year in which the child reaches the age of 25 if the child 495 continues to be dependent for support, or the child is a full 496 time or part-time student and is dependent for support. The term 497 âhealth insurance planâ does not include supplemental benefits 498 that are not part of the basic group health insurance plan. If 499 the injured employee subsequently dies, the employer shall 500 continue to pay the entire health insurance premium for the 501 surviving spouse until remarried, and for the dependent 502 children, under the conditions outlined in this paragraph. 503 However: 504 a.âHealth insurance benefits payable from any other source 505 shall reduce benefits payable under this section. 506 b.âIt is unlawful for a person to willfully and knowingly 507 make, or cause to be made, or to assist, conspire with, or urge 508 another to make, or cause to be made, any false, fraudulent, or 509 misleading oral or written statement to obtain health insurance 510 coverage as provided under this paragraph. A person who violates 511 this sub-subparagraph commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, 512 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 513 c.âIn addition to any applicable criminal penalty, upon 514 conviction for a violation as described in sub-subparagraph b., 515 a law enforcement, correctional, or correctional probation 516 officer or other beneficiary who receives or seeks to receive 517 health insurance benefits under this paragraph shall forfeit the 518 right to receive such health insurance benefits, and shall 519 reimburse the employer for all benefits paid due to the fraud or 520 other prohibited activity. For purposes of this sub 521 subparagraph, the term âconvictionâ means a determination of 522 guilt that is the result of a plea or trial, regardless of 523 whether adjudication is withheld. 524 2.âIn order for the officer, spouse, and dependent children 525 to be eligible for such insurance coverage, the injury must have 526 occurred while the officer was in the line of duty or engaged in 527 an official training exercise. Except as otherwise provided 528 herein, this paragraph may not be construed to limit health 529 insurance coverage for which the officer, spouse, or dependent 530 children may otherwise be eligible, except that a person who 531 qualifies under this section is not eligible for the health 532 insurance subsidy provided under chapter 121, chapter 175, or 533 chapter 185. 534 Reviserâs note.âAmended to improve clarity. 535 Section 12.âParagraph (g) of subsection (2) of section 536 112.191, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 537 112.191âFirefighters; death benefits.â 538 (2) 539 (g)1.âAny employer who employs a full-time firefighter who, 540 on or after January 1, 1995, suffers a catastrophic injury, as 541 defined in s. 440.02, Florida Statutes 2002, in the line of duty 542 shall pay the entire premium of the employerâs health insurance 543 plan for the injured employee, for the injured employeeâs 544 spouse, and for each dependent child of the injured employee 545 until the child reaches the age of majority or until the end of 546 the calendar year in which the child reaches the age of 25 if 547 the child continues to be dependent for support, or the child is 548 a full-time or part-time student and is dependent for support. 549 The term âhealth insurance planâ does not include supplemental 550 benefits that are not part of the basic group health insurance 551 plan. If the injured employee subsequently dies, the employer 552 shall continue to pay the entire health insurance premium for 553 the surviving spouse until remarried, and for the dependent 554 children, under the conditions outlined in this paragraph. 555 However: 556 a.âHealth insurance benefits payable from any other source 557 shall reduce benefits payable under this section. 558 b.âIt is unlawful for a person to willfully and knowingly 559 make, or cause to be made, or to assist, conspire with, or urge 560 another to make, or cause to be made, any false, fraudulent, or 561 misleading oral or written statement to obtain health insurance 562 coverage as provided under this paragraph. A person who violates 563 this sub-subparagraph commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, 564 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 565 c.âIn addition to any applicable criminal penalty, upon 566 conviction for a violation as described in sub-subparagraph b., 567 a firefighter or other beneficiary who receives or seeks to 568 receive health insurance benefits under this paragraph shall 569 forfeit the right to receive such health insurance benefits, and 570 shall reimburse the employer for all benefits paid due to the 571 fraud or other prohibited activity. For purposes of this sub 572 subparagraph, the term âconvictionâ means a determination of 573 guilt that is the result of a plea or trial, regardless of 574 whether adjudication is withheld. 575 2.âIn order for the firefighter, spouse, and dependent 576 children to be eligible for such insurance coverage, the injury 577 must have occurred as the result of the firefighterâs response 578 to what is reasonably believed to be an emergency involving the 579 protection of life or property or an unlawful act perpetrated by 580 another, or the injury must have occurred during an official 581 training exercise in which the firefighter became totally and 582 permanently disabled. Except as otherwise provided herein, this 583 paragraph may not be construed to limit health insurance 584 coverage for which the firefighter, spouse, or dependent 585 children may otherwise be eligible, except that a person who 586 qualifies for benefits under this section is not eligible for 587 the health insurance subsidy provided under chapter 121, chapter 588 175, or chapter 185. 589 590 Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, 591 the death benefits provided in paragraphs (b), (c), and (f) 592 shall also be applicable and paid in cases where a firefighter 593 received bodily injury prior to July 1, 1993, and subsequently 594 died on or after July 1, 1993, as a result of such in-line-of 595 duty injury. 596 Reviserâs note.âAmended to improve clarity. 597 Section 13.âSubsection (4) of section 112.22, Florida 598 Statutes, is amended to read: 599 112.22âUse of applications from foreign countries of 600 concern prohibited.â 601 (4)(a)âNotwithstanding s. 120.74(4) and (5), the department 602 is authorized, and all conditions are deemed met, to adopt 603 emergency rules pursuant to s. 120.54(4) and to implement 604 paragraph (3)(a). Such rulemaking must occur initially by filing 605 emergency rules within 30 days after July 1, 2023. 606 (b)âThe department shall adopt rules necessary to 607 administer this section. 608 Reviserâs note.âAmended to delete an obsolete provision; rule 609 60GG-2.008, Florida Administrative Code, became effective 610 December 18, 2023. 611 Section 14.âParagraph (e) of subsection (7) of section 612 125.01055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 613 125.01055âAffordable housing.â 614 (7) 615 (e)1.âA proposed development authorized under this 616 subsection must be administratively approved without further 617 action by the board of county commissioners or any quasi 618 judicial or administrative board or reviewing body if the 619 development satisfies the countyâs land development regulations 620 for multifamily developments in areas zoned for such use and is 621 otherwise consistent with the comprehensive plan, with the 622 exception of provisions establishing allowable densities, floor 623 area ratios, height, and land use. Such land development 624 regulations include, but are not limited to, regulations 625 relating to setbacks and parking requirements. A proposed 626 development located within one-quarter mile of a military 627 installation identified in s. 163.3175(2) may not be 628 administratively approved. Each county shall maintain on its 629 website a policy containing procedures and expectations for 630 administrative approval pursuant to this subsection. For 631 purposes of this subparagraph, the term âallowable densityâ 632 means the density prescribed for the property in accordance with 633 this subsection without additional requirements to procure and 634 transfer density units or development units from other 635 properties. 636 2.âThe county must administratively approve the demolition 637 of an existing structure associated with a proposed development 638 under this subsection, without further action by the board of 639 county commissioners or any quasi-judicial or administrative 640 board or reviewing body, if the proposed demolition otherwise 641 complies with all state and local regulations. 642 3.âIf the proposed development is on a parcel with a 643 contributing structure or building within a historic district 644 which was listed in the National Register of Historic Places 645 before January 1, 2000, or is on a parcel with a structure or 646 building individually listed in the National Register of 647 Historic Places, the county may administratively require the 648 proposed development to comply with local regulations relating 649 to architectural design, such as facade replication, provided it 650 does not affect height, floor area ratio, or of density of the 651 proposed development. 652 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution to 653 conform to context. 654 Section 15.âParagraph (e) of subsection (7) of section 655 166.04151, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 656 166.04151âAffordable housing.â 657 (7) 658 (e)1.âA proposed development authorized under this 659 subsection must be administratively approved without further 660 action by the governing body of the municipality or any quasi 661 judicial or administrative board or reviewing body if the 662 development satisfies the municipalityâs land development 663 regulations for multifamily developments in areas zoned for such 664 use and is otherwise consistent with the comprehensive plan, 665 with the exception of provisions establishing allowable 666 densities, floor area ratios, height, and land use. Such land 667 development regulations include, but are not limited to, 668 regulations relating to setbacks and parking requirements. A 669 proposed development located within one-quarter mile of a 670 military installation identified in s. 163.3175(2) may not be 671 administratively approved. Each municipality shall maintain on 672 its website a policy containing procedures and expectations for 673 administrative approval pursuant to this subsection. For 674 purposes of this paragraph, the term âallowable densityâ means 675 the density prescribed for the property in accordance with this 676 subsection without additional requirements to procure and 677 transfer density units or development units from other 678 properties. 679 2.âThe municipality must administratively approve the 680 demolition of an existing structure associated with a proposed 681 development under this subsection, without further action by the 682 governing body of the municipality or any quasi-judicial or 683 administrative board or reviewing body, if the proposed 684 demolition otherwise complies with all state and local 685 regulations. 686 3.âIf the proposed development is on a parcel with a 687 contributing structure or building within a historic district 688 which was listed in the National Register of Historic Places 689 before January 1, 2000, or is on a parcel with a structure or 690 building individually listed in the National Register of 691 Historic Places, the municipality may administratively require 692 the proposed development to comply with local regulations 693 relating to architectural design, such as facade replication, 694 provided it does not affect height, floor area ratio, or of 695 density of the proposed development. 696 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution to 697 conform to context. 698 Section 16.âParagraph (f) of subsection (4) of section 699 202.34, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 700 202.34âRecords required to be kept; power to inspect; audit 701 procedure.â 702 (4) 703 (f)âOnce the notification required by paragraph (a) is 704 issued, the department, at any time, may respond to contact 705 initiated by a taxpayer to discuss the audit, and the taxpayer 706 may provide records or other information, electronically or 707 otherwise, to the department. The department may examine, at any 708 time, documentation and other information voluntarily provided 709 by the taxpayer, its representative, or other parties; 710 information already in the departmentâs possession; or publicly 711 available information. Examination by the department of such 712 information does not commence an audit if the review takes place 713 within 60 days after the notice of intent to conduct an audit. 714 The requirement in paragraph (a) does not prohibit the 715 department from making initial contact with the taxpayer to 716 confirm receipt of the notification or to confirm the date that 717 the audit will begin. If the taxpayer has not previously waived 718 the 60-day notice period and believes the department commenced 719 the audit before the 61st day, the taxpayer must object in 720 writing to the department before the issuance of an assessment 721 or the objection is waived. If the objection is not waived and 722 it is determined during a formal or informal protest that the 723 audit was commenced before the 61st day after the issuance of 724 the notice of intent to audit, the tolling period provided for 725 in s. 213.345 shall be considered lifted for the number of days 726 equal to the difference between the date the audit commenced and 727 the 61st day after the date of the departmentâs notice of intent 728 to audit. 729 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial insertion to 730 improve clarity. 731 Section 17.âParagraph (b) of subsection (20) of section 732 212.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 733 212.08âSales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and 734 storage tax; specified exemptions.âThe sale at retail, the 735 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the 736 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following 737 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this 738 chapter. 739 (20)âANNUAL BACK-TO-SCHOOL SALES TAX HOLIDAY.â 740 (b)âThe tax exemptions provided in this subsection do not 741 apply to sales within a theme park or entertainment complex as 742 defined in s. 509.013(9), within a public lodging establishment 743 as defined in s. 509.013(4), or within an airport as defined in 744 s. 330.27(3) s. 330.27(2). 745 Reviserâs note.âAmended to correct a cross-reference to conform 746 to the redesignation of subunits in s. 330.27 by s. 12, ch. 747 2025-155, Laws of Florida. 748 Section 18.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1), subsections 749 (2) and (3), paragraph (a) of subsection (4), and subsection (5) 750 of section 212.099, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 751 212.099âCredit for contributions to eligible nonprofit 752 scholarship-funding organizations.â 753 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 754 (a)ââEligible businessâ means a tenant or person actually 755 occupying, using, or entitled to the use of any property from 756 which the rental or license fee is subject to taxation under 757 former s. 212.031. 758 (2)âAn eligible business shall be granted a credit against 759 the tax imposed under former s. 212.031 and collected from the 760 eligible business by a dealer. The credit shall be in an amount 761 equal to 100 percent of an eligible contribution made to an 762 organization on or before July 1, 2025. 763 (3)âA dealer shall take a credit against the tax imposed 764 under former s. 212.031 in an amount equal to the credit taken 765 by the eligible business under subsection (2). 766 (4)(a)âAn eligible business must apply to the department 767 for an allocation of tax credits under this section. The 768 eligible business must specify in the application the state 769 fiscal year during which the contribution will be made, the 770 organization that will receive the contribution, the planned 771 amount of the contribution, the address of the property from 772 which the rental or license fee is subject to taxation under 773 former s. 212.031, and the federal employer identification 774 number of the dealer who collects the tax imposed under former 775 s. 212.031 from the eligible business and who will reduce 776 collection of taxes from the eligible business pursuant to this 777 section. The department shall approve allocations of tax credits 778 on a first-come, first-served basis and shall provide to the 779 eligible business a separate approval or denial letter for each 780 dealer for which the eligible business applied for an allocation 781 of tax credits. The department may not approve any allocations 782 of tax credits after July 1, 2025. Within 10 days after 783 approving or denying an application, the department shall 784 provide a copy of its approval or denial letter to the 785 organization specified by the eligible business in the 786 application. An approval letter must include the name and 787 federal employer identification number of the dealer from whom a 788 credit under this section can be taken and the amount of tax 789 credits approved for use with that dealer. 790 (5)âEach dealer that receives from an eligible business a 791 copy of the departmentâs approval letter and a certificate of 792 contribution, both of which identify the dealer as the dealer 793 who collects the tax imposed under former s. 212.031 from the 794 eligible business and who will reduce collection of taxes from 795 the eligible business pursuant to this section, shall reduce the 796 tax collected from the eligible business under former s. 212.031 797 by the total amount of contributions indicated in the 798 certificate of contribution. The reduction may not exceed the 799 amount of credit allocation approved by the department and may 800 not exceed the amount of tax that would otherwise be collected 801 from the eligible business by a dealer when a payment is made 802 under the rental or license fee arrangement. However, payments 803 by an eligible business to a dealer may not be reduced before 804 October 1, 2018, or after October 1, 2025. 805 (a)âIf the total amount of credits an eligible business may 806 take cannot be fully used within any period that a payment is 807 due under the rental or license fee arrangement because of an 808 insufficient amount of tax that the dealer would collect from 809 the eligible business during that period, the unused amount may 810 be carried forward for a period not to exceed 10 years. 811 (b)âNotwithstanding any other law, after July 1, 2025, any 812 unused earned credit held by an eligible business may be claimed 813 through a refund. An eligible business must attach a copy of the 814 departmentâs approval letter and the certificate of contribution 815 to its refund application, which must be submitted to the 816 department by December 31, 2026, in order to receive the refund. 817 (c)âA tax credit may not be claimed on an amended return. 818 (d)âA dealer that claims a tax credit must file returns and 819 pay taxes by electronic means under s. 213.755. 820 (e)âAn eligible business may not convey, assign, or 821 transfer an approved tax credit or a carryforward tax credit to 822 another entity unless all of the assets of the eligible business 823 are conveyed, assigned, or transferred in the same transaction 824 and the successor business continues the same lease with the 825 dealer. 826 (f)âWithin any state fiscal year, an eligible business may 827 rescind all or part of a tax credit approved under this section. 828 The amount rescinded shall become available for that state 829 fiscal year to another eligible business as approved by the 830 department if the business receives notice from the department 831 that the rescindment has been accepted by the department. Any 832 amount rescinded under this subsection shall become available to 833 an eligible business on a first-come, first-served basis based 834 on tax credit applications received after the date the 835 rescindment is accepted by the department. 836 (g)âWithin 10 days after the rescindment of a tax credit 837 under paragraph (f) is accepted by the department, the 838 department shall notify the eligible nonprofit scholarship 839 funding organization specified by the eligible business. The 840 department shall also include the eligible nonprofit 841 scholarship-funding organization specified by the eligible 842 business on all letters or correspondence of acknowledgment for 843 tax credits under this section. 844 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to the repeal of s. 212.031 845 by s. 37, ch. 2025-208, Laws of Florida. 846 Section 19.âParagraph (f) of subsection (5) of section 847 212.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 848 212.13âRecords required to be kept; power to inspect; audit 849 procedure.â 850 (5) 851 (f)âOnce the notification required by paragraph (a) is 852 issued, the department, at any time, may respond to contact 853 initiated by a taxpayer to discuss the audit, and the taxpayer 854 may provide records or other information, electronically or 855 otherwise, to the department. The department may examine, at any 856 time, documentation and other information voluntarily provided 857 by the taxpayer, its representative, or other parties; 858 information already in the departmentâs possession; or publicly 859 available information. Examination by the department of such 860 information does not commence an audit if the review takes place 861 within 60 days after the notice of intent to conduct an audit. 862 The requirement in paragraph (a) does not prohibit the 863 department from making initial contact with the taxpayer to 864 confirm receipt of the notification or to confirm the date that 865 the audit will begin. If the taxpayer has not previously waived 866 the 60-day notice period and believes the department commenced 867 the audit before the 61st day, the taxpayer must object in 868 writing to the department before the issuance of an assessment 869 or the objection is waived. If the objection is not waived and 870 it is determined during a formal or informal protest that the 871 audit was commenced before the 61st day after the issuance of 872 the notice of intent to audit, the tolling period provided for 873 in s. 213.345 shall be considered lifted for the number of days 874 equal to the difference between the date the audit commenced and 875 the 61st day after the date of the departmentâs notice of intent 876 to audit. 877 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial insertion to 878 improve clarity. 879 Section 20.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 880 258.004, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 881 258.004âDuties of division.â 882 (1)âThe Division of Recreation and Parks of the Department 883 of Environmental Protection shall: 884 (b)âPreserve, manage, regulate, and protect all parks and 885 recreational areas held by the state. The Division of Recreation 886 and Parks may provide these services by contract or interagency 887 agreement for any water management district when the governing 888 board of a water management district designates or sets aside 889 any park or recreation area within its boundaries. 890 1.âAll lands managed pursuant to this chapter must be 891 managed: 892 a.âIn a manner that will provide the greatest combination 893 of benefits to the public and to the landâs natural resources; 894 and 895 b.âFor conservation-based recreational uses and associated 896 facilities; public access and related amenities, including 897 roads, parking areas, walkways, and visitor centers; Florida 898 heritage and wildlife viewing, including preservation of 899 historical structures and activities such as glass bottom boat 900 tours; and scientific research, including archaeology. Such uses 901 must be managed in a manner that is compatible with and ensures 902 the conservation of this stateâs natural resources by minimizing 903 impacts to undisturbed habitat. As used in this sub 904 subparagraph, the term âconservation-based recreational usesâ 905 means public outdoor recreational activities that do not 906 significantly invade, degrade, or displace the natural 907 resources, native habitats, or archaeological or historical 908 sites that are preserved within state parks. These activities 909 include, but are not limited to, fishing, camping, bicycling, 910 hiking, nature study, swimming, boating, canoeing, horseback 911 riding, diving, birding, sailing, and jogging. 912 2.âTo ensure the protection of state park resources, native 913 habitats, and archaeological and historical sites, sporting 914 facilities, including, but not limited to, golf courses, tennis 915 courts, pickleball courts, ball fields, or other sporting 916 facilities, may not be constructed within the boundaries of 917 state parks. This subparagraph may not be construed to prohibit 918 the continued operation, maintenance, or repair of any such 919 sporting facilities, or other facilities, existing within a 920 state park. 921 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial insertion to 922 improve clarity. 923 Section 21.âParagraph (m) of subsection (2) of section 924 288.062, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 925 288.062âRural Community Investment Program.â 926 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 927 (m)ââTaxpayerâ means a person who makes an investor 928 contribution and is a taxpayer as defined in s. 220.03(1)(z) s. 929 220.03(z) or a person with tax liability under s. 624.509. 930 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution to 931 correct a cross-reference to conform to the correct 932 location of the term âtaxpayer.â 933 Section 22.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 934 316.193, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 935 316.193âDriving under the influence; penalties.â 936 (3)âAny person: 937 (c)âWho, by reason of such operation, causes or contributes 938 to causing: 939 1.âDamage to the property or person of another commits a 940 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 941 775.082 or s. 775.083. 942 2.âSerious bodily injury to another, as defined in s. 943 316.1933, commits a felony of the third degree, punishable as 944 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 945 3.âThe death of any human being or unborn child commits DUI 946 manslaughter, and commits: 947 a.âA felony of the second degree, punishable as provided in 948 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 949 b.âA felony of the first degree, punishable as provided in 950 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, if: 951 (I)âAt the time of the crash, the person knew, or should 952 have known, that the crash occurred; and 953 (II)âThe person failed to give information and render aid 954 as required by s. 316.062. 955 c.âA felony of the first degree, punishable as provided in 956 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, if the person has a prior 957 conviction under this subparagraph, s. 327.35(3)(a)3.c. s. 958 327.35(3)(c)3., s. 782.071, or s. 782.072. 959 960 For purposes of this subsection, the term âunborn childâ has the 961 same meaning as provided in s. 775.021(5). A person who is 962 convicted of DUI manslaughter shall be sentenced to a mandatory 963 minimum term of imprisonment of 4 years. 964 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution to 965 conform to the redesignation of subunits in s. 327.35(3) by 966 s. 6, ch. 2025-197, Laws of Florida. 967 Section 23.âSubsection (4) of section 327.4111, Florida 968 Statutes, is amended to read: 969 327.4111âLong-term anchoring.â 970 (4)âA person who engages in long-term anchoring of a vessel 971 within the waters of this state without a valid long-term 972 anchoring permit commits a noncriminal infraction, punishable as 973 provided in is s. 327.73. 974 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial insertion to 975 conform to context. 976 Section 24.âParagraph (g) of subsection (2) of section 977 330.41, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 978 330.41âUnmanned Aircraft Systems Act.â 979 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this act, the term: 980 (g)ââProperty ownerâ means the owner or owners of record of 981 real property. The term includes real property held in trust for 982 the benefit of one or more individuals, in which case the 983 individual or individuals may be considered as the property 984 owner or owners, provided that the trustee provides written 985 consent. The term does not include persons renting, using, 986 living in, or otherwise occupying real property. 987 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial insertion to 988 improve clarity. 989 Section 25.âSubsection (4) of section 332.136, Florida 990 Statutes, is amended to read: 991 332.136âSarasota Manatee Airport Authority; airport pilot 992 program.â 993 (4)âThis section shall stand repealed on June 30, 2028, 994 unless reviewed and saved from repeal appeal through reenactment 995 by the Legislature. 996 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to context. 997 Section 26.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 998 338.26, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 999 338.26âAlligator Alley toll road.â 1000 (3)(a)âFees generated from tolls shall be deposited in the 1001 State Transportation Trust Fund and shall be used: 1002 1.âTo reimburse outstanding contractual obligations; 1003 2.âTo operate and maintain the highway and toll facilities, 1004 including reconstruction and restoration; 1005 3.âTo pay for those projects that are funded with Alligator 1006 Alley toll revenues and that are contained in the 1993-1994 1007 adopted work program or the 1994-1995 tentative work program 1008 submitted to the Legislature on February 22, 1994; and 1009 4.âBy interlocal agreement, to reimburse a local 1010 governmental entity for the direct actual costs of operating the 1011 fire station at mile marker 63 on Alligator Alley, which shall 1012 be used by the local governmental entity to provide fire, 1013 rescue, and emergency management services exclusively to the 1014 public on Alligator Alley. The local governmental entity must 1015 contribute 10 percent of the direct actual operating costs. 1016 a.âThe interlocal agreement effective July 1, 2019, through 1017 no later than June 30, 2027, shall control until such time that 1018 the local governmental entity and the department enter into a 1019 new agreement or agree to extend the existing agreement. For the 1020 2024-2025 fiscal year, the amount of reimbursement may not 1021 exceed $2 million. 1022 b.âBy December 31, 2024, and every 5 years thereafter, the 1023 local governmental entity shall provide a maintenance and 1024 operations comprehensive plan to the department. The 1025 comprehensive plan must include a current inventory of assets, 1026 including their projected service life, and area service needs; 1027 the call and response history for emergency services provided in 1028 the preceding 5 years on Alligator Alley, including costs; and 1029 future projections for assets and equipment, including 1030 replacement or purchase needs, and operating costs. 1031 c.âThe local governmental entity and the department shall 1032 review and adopt the comprehensive plan as part of the 1033 interlocal agreement. 1034 d.âIn accordance with projected incoming toll revenues for 1035 Alligator Alley, the department shall include the corresponding 1036 funding needs of the comprehensive plan in the departmentâs work 1037 program, and the local governmental entity shall include the 1038 same in its capital comprehensive plan and the appropriate 1039 fiscal year budget. 1040 e.âAt the end of the term of the interlocal agreement, the 1041 ownership and title of all fire, rescue, and emergency equipment 1042 purchased with state funds and used at the fire station during 1043 the term of the interlocal agreement transfers to the state. 1044 Reviserâs note.âAmended to delete obsolete language. 1045 Section 27.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 1046 388.46, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1047 388.46âFlorida Coordinating Council on Mosquito Control; 1048 establishment; membership; organization; responsibilities.â 1049 (2)âMEMBERSHIP, ORGANIZATION, AND RESPONSIBILITIES.â 1050 (a)âMembership.âThe Florida Coordinating Council on 1051 Mosquito Control shall be composed of the following 1052 representatives or their authorized designees: 1053 1.âThe Secretary of Environmental Protection. 1054 2.âThe State Surgeon General. 1055 3.âThe executive director of the Fish and Wildlife 1056 Conservation Commission. 1057 4.âThe state epidemiologist. 1058 5.âThe Commissioner of Agriculture. 1059 6.âThe Board of Trustees of the Internal Improvement Trust 1060 Fund. 1061 7.âRepresentatives from: 1062 a.âThe University of Florida, Institute of Food and 1063 Agricultural Sciences, Florida Medical Entomological Research 1064 Laboratory. 1065 b.âThe United States Environmental Protection Agency. 1066 c.âThe United States Department of Agriculture, Center for 1067 of Medical, Agricultural, and Veterinary Entomology. 1068 d.âThe United States Fish and Wildlife Service. 1069 8.âFour mosquito control directors to be nominated by the 1070 Florida Mosquito Control Association, two representatives of 1071 Florida environmental groups, and two private citizens who are 1072 property owners whose lands are regularly subject to mosquito 1073 control operations, to be appointed to 4-year terms by the 1074 Commissioner of Agriculture and serve until his or her successor 1075 is appointed. 1076 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution to 1077 conform to the correct name of the center. 1078 Section 28.âSubsection (10) of section 391.026, Florida 1079 Statutes, is amended to read: 1080 391.026âPowers and duties of the department.âThe department 1081 shall have the following powers, duties, and responsibilities: 1082 (10)âTo serve as the lead agency in administering the Early 1083 Steps Program pursuant to part C of the federal Individuals with 1084 Disabilities Education Act and part II III of this chapter. 1085 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to the redesignation of part 1086 III of chapter 391 as part II by s. 18, ch. 2025-88, Laws 1087 of Florida. 1088 Section 29.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 1089 394.4575, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1090 394.4575âStudent mental health assistance program 1091 evaluation.â 1092 (1)âThe Office of Program Policy Analysis and Government 1093 Accountability (OPPAGA), in consultation with the Department of 1094 Children and Families, the Department of Education, the Louis de 1095 la Parte Florida Mental Health Institute, and any other 1096 identified relevant stakeholder, must evaluate school district 1097 compliance with ss. 1001.212(11), 1006.041, and 1012.584(4) and 1098 the mental health services and supports provided to students 1099 pursuant to those sections. OPPAGA must: 1100 (b)âBy December 1, 2026, provide a final review and 1101 evaluation of the mental health assistance programs within the 1102 school districts to the Governor, the President of the Senate, 1103 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. The evaluation 1104 must include, but is not limited to: 1105 1.âAn assessment of school district compliance with the 1106 requirements of ss. 1001.212(11), 1006.041, and 1012.584(4). 1107 2.âAn assessment of the treatment outcomes, system 1108 capacity, and performance of mental health services provided 1109 pursuant to s. 1006.041(2)(a) and (b). 1110 3.âAn assessment of the mental health assistance programsâ 1111 ongoing level of integration with the coordinated system of care 1112 required under s. 394.4573. 1113 4.âRecommendations to enhance treatment outcomes, system 1114 capacity, and performance of school-based the mental health 1115 assistance programs and increase the integration of those 1116 programs into the coordinated system of care. 1117 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial deletion to 1118 improve clarity. 1119 Section 30.âSubsection (12) of section 400.126, Florida 1120 Statutes, is amended to read: 1121 400.126âReceivership proceedings.â 1122 (12)âConcurrently with the appointment of a receiver, the 1123 agency and the Department of Elderly Affairs shall coordinate an 1124 assessment of each resident in the facility by the Comprehensive 1125 Assessment and Review for Long-Term Care Services Long-Term-Care 1126 (CARES) Program for the purpose of evaluating each residentâs 1127 need for the level of care provided in a nursing facility and 1128 the potential for providing such care in alternative settings. 1129 If the CARES assessment determines that a resident could be 1130 cared for in a less restrictive setting or does not meet the 1131 criteria for skilled or intermediate care in a nursing home, the 1132 department and agency shall refer the resident for such care, as 1133 is appropriate for the resident. Residents referred pursuant to 1134 this subsection shall be given primary consideration for 1135 receiving services under the community care for the elderly 1136 program in the same manner as persons classified to receive such 1137 services pursuant to s. 430.205. 1138 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution to 1139 conform to the correct name of the program. 1140 Section 31.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 1141 400.191, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1142 400.191âAvailability, distribution, and posting of reports 1143 and records.â 1144 (2)âThe agency shall publish the Nursing Home Guide 1145 quarterly in electronic form to assist consumers and their 1146 families in comparing and evaluating nursing home facilities. 1147 (a)âThe agency shall provide an Internet site which must 1148 include at least the following information either directly or 1149 indirectly through a link to another established site or sites 1150 of the agencyâs choosing: 1151 1.âA section entitled âHave you considered programs that 1152 provide alternatives to nursing home care?â which must be the 1153 first section of the Nursing Home Guide and must prominently 1154 display information about available alternatives to nursing 1155 homes and how to obtain additional information regarding these 1156 alternatives. The Nursing Home Guide must explain that this 1157 state offers alternative programs that allow qualified elderly 1158 persons to stay in their homes instead of being placed in 1159 nursing homes and must encourage interested persons to call the 1160 Comprehensive Assessment and Review and Evaluation for Long-Term 1161 Care Services (CARES) Program to inquire as to whether they 1162 qualify. The Nursing Home Guide must list available home and 1163 community-based programs and must clearly state the services 1164 that are provided, including whether nursing home services are 1165 covered under those programs when necessary. 1166 2.âA list by name and address of all nursing home 1167 facilities in this state, including any prior name by which a 1168 facility was known during the previous 24-month period. 1169 3.âWhether such nursing home facilities are proprietary or 1170 nonproprietary. 1171 4.âThe current owner of the facilityâs license and the year 1172 that that entity became the owner of the license. 1173 5.âThe name of the owner or owners of each facility and 1174 whether the facility is affiliated with a company or other 1175 organization owning or managing more than one nursing facility 1176 in this state. 1177 6.âThe total number of beds in each facility and the most 1178 recently available occupancy levels. 1179 7.âThe number of private and semiprivate rooms in each 1180 facility. 1181 8.âThe religious affiliation, if any, of each facility. 1182 9.âThe languages spoken by the administrator and staff of 1183 each facility. 1184 10.âWhether or not each facility accepts Medicare or 1185 Medicaid recipients or insurance, health maintenance 1186 organization, United States Department of Veterans Affairs, 1187 CHAMPUS program, or workersâ compensation coverage. 1188 11.âRecreational and other programs available at each 1189 facility. 1190 12.âSpecial care units or programs offered at each 1191 facility. 1192 13.âWhether the facility is a part of a retirement 1193 community that offers other services pursuant to part III of 1194 this chapter or part I or part III of chapter 429. 1195 14.âSurvey and deficiency information, including all 1196 federal and state recertification, licensure, revisit, and 1197 complaint survey information, for each facility. For 1198 noncertified nursing homes, state survey and deficiency 1199 information, including licensure, revisit, and complaint survey 1200 information, shall be provided. 1201 15.âThe results of consumer satisfaction surveys conducted 1202 pursuant to s. 400.0225. 1203 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution to 1204 conform to the correct name of the program. 1205 Section 32.âParagraph (e) of subsection (17) of section 1206 409.910, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1207 409.910âResponsibility for payments on behalf of Medicaid 1208 eligible persons when other parties are liable.â 1209 (17) 1210 (e)âEach party shall bear its own attorney fees and costs 1211 for any administrative proceeding conducted pursuant to 1212 paragraphs (b)-(e) this paragraph. 1213 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution for 1214 a reference to âthis paragraph,â as referenced in the 1215 amendment by s. 6, ch. 2013-48, Laws of Florida, and which 1216 language became paragraphs (b)-(e) in the compilation of 1217 the text pursuant to redesignation by s. 2, ch. 2013-150, 1218 Laws of Florida. Section 2, ch. 2013-150, referenced 1219 âparagraph (a) or paragraph (b).â 1220 Section 33.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 1221 409.979, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1222 409.979âEligibility.â 1223 (1)âPREREQUISITE CRITERIA FOR ELIGIBILITY.âMedicaid 1224 recipients who meet all of the following criteria are eligible 1225 to receive long-term care services and must receive long-term 1226 care services by participating in the long-term care managed 1227 care program. The recipient must be: 1228 (b)âDetermined by the Comprehensive Assessment and Review 1229 and Evaluation for Long-Term Care Services (CARES) preadmission 1230 screening program to require: 1231 1.âNursing facility care as defined in s. 409.985(3); or 1232 2.âHospital level of care, for individuals diagnosed with 1233 cystic fibrosis. 1234 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution to 1235 conform to the correct name of the program. 1236 Section 34.âSubsections (6), (7), (8), and (15) of section 1237 427.703, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1238 427.703âDefinitions.âAs used in this part: 1239 (8)(6)ââDeafblindâ means having both a permanent hearing 1240 impairment and a permanent visual impairment and includes dual 1241 sensory impairment. 1242 (6)(7)ââDeaf service centerâ means a center that serves, 1243 within a defined region, individuals with hearing loss or speech 1244 impairment or who are deafblind, by distributing equipment and 1245 providing services on behalf of the administrator. 1246 (7)(8)ââDeaf service center directorâ means an individual 1247 who serves as the director for a deaf service center and is 1248 responsible for ensuring that individuals with hearing loss or 1249 speech impairment or who are deafblind are qualified to receive 1250 equipment or services in accordance with ss. 427.701-427.708, 1251 based on their impairment by attesting to such impairment as 1252 provided for in the procedures developed by the administrator. 1253 (15)ââRegional distribution center directorâ means an 1254 individual qualified by the administrator who serves as the 1255 director for a regional distribution center and meets the 1256 standards for ensuring that individuals with hearing loss or 1257 speech impairment or who are deafblind are qualified to receive 1258 equipment or services in accordance with ss. 427.701-427.708, 1259 based on their impairment by attesting to such impairment as 1260 provided for in the procedures developed by the administrator. 1261 Reviserâs note.âSubsections (6)-(8) are amended to conform to 1262 the alphabetical ordering of definitions in this section. 1263 Subsection (15) is amended to confirm editorial insertions 1264 to conform to language elsewhere in the section. 1265 Section 35.âSection 429.55, Florida Statutes, is amended to 1266 read: 1267 429.55âConsumer information.â 1268 (1)âCONSUMER INFORMATION WEBSITE.âThe Legislature finds 1269 that consumers need additional information on the quality of 1270 care and service in assisted living facilities in order to 1271 select the best facility for themselves or their loved ones. 1272 Therefore, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall 1273 create content that is easily accessible through the home page 1274 of the agencyâs website either directly or indirectly through 1275 links to one or more other established websites of the agencyâs 1276 choosing. The website must be searchable by facility name, 1277 license type, city, or zip code. By November 1, 2015, The agency 1278 shall include all content in its possession on the website and 1279 add content when received from facilities. At a minimum, the 1280 content must include: 1281 (a)âInformation on each licensed assisted living facility, 1282 including, but not limited to: 1283 1.âThe name and address of the facility. 1284 2.âThe name of the owner or operator of the facility. 1285 3.âThe number and type of licensed beds in the facility. 1286 4.âThe types of licenses held by the facility. 1287 5.âThe facilityâs license expiration date and status. 1288 6.âThe total number of clients that the facility is 1289 licensed to serve and the most recently available occupancy 1290 levels. 1291 7.âThe number of private and semiprivate rooms offered. 1292 8.âThe bed-hold policy. 1293 9.âThe religious affiliation, if any, of the assisted 1294 living facility. 1295 10.âThe languages spoken by the staff. 1296 11.âAvailability of nurses. 1297 12.âForms of payment accepted, including, but not limited 1298 to, Medicaid, Medicaid long-term managed care, private 1299 insurance, health maintenance organization, United States 1300 Department of Veterans Affairs, CHAMPUS program, or workersâ 1301 compensation coverage. 1302 13.âIndication if the licensee is operating under 1303 bankruptcy protection. 1304 14.âRecreational and other programs available. 1305 15.âSpecial care units or programs offered. 1306 16.âWhether the facility is a part of a retirement 1307 community that offers other services pursuant to this part or 1308 part III of this chapter, part II or part III of chapter 400, or 1309 chapter 651. 1310 17.âLinks to the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program 1311 website and the programâs statewide toll-free telephone number. 1312 18.âLinks to the websites of the providers. 1313 19.âOther relevant information that the agency currently 1314 collects. 1315 (b)âSurvey and violation information for the facility, 1316 including a list of the facilityâs violations committed during 1317 the previous 60 months, which on July 1, 2015, may include 1318 violations committed on or after July 1, 2010. The list shall be 1319 updated monthly and include for each violation: 1320 1.âA summary of the violation, including all licensure, 1321 revisit, and complaint survey information, presented in a manner 1322 understandable by the general public. 1323 2.âAny sanctions imposed by final order. 1324 3.âThe date the corrective action was confirmed by the 1325 agency. 1326 (c)âLinks to inspection reports that the agency has on 1327 file. 1328 (2)âVENOUS THROMBOEMBOLISM (VTE) VTE CONSUMER INFORMATION.â 1329 (a)âThe Legislature finds that many pulmonary embolisms 1330 (PEs) PEs are preventable and that information about the 1331 prevalence of the disease could save lives. 1332 (b)âThe term âpulmonary embolismâ or âPEâ means a condition 1333 in which part of a the clot located in a deep vein breaks off 1334 and travels to the lungs, possibly causing death. 1335 (c)âThe term âvenous thromboembolismâ or âVTEâ means deep 1336 vein thrombosis, which is a blood clot located in a deep vein, 1337 usually in the leg or arm. The term can be used to refer to deep 1338 vein thrombosis, pulmonary embolism, or both. 1339 (d)âAssisted living facilities must provide a consumer 1340 information pamphlet to residents upon admission. The pamphlet 1341 must contain information about venous thromboembolism, including 1342 risk factors and how residents can recognize the signs and 1343 symptoms of venous thromboembolism. 1344 1345 The agency may adopt rules to administer this section. 1346 Reviserâs note.âSubsection (1) is amended to delete obsolete 1347 language. Subsection (2) is amended to improve clarity. 1348 Section 36.âParagraph (h) of subsection (4) of section 1349 445.004, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1350 445.004âCareerSource Florida, Inc., and the state board; 1351 creation; purpose; membership; duties and powers.â 1352 (4) 1353 (h)1.âThe state board shall appoint a Credentials Review 1354 Committee to identify nondegree credentials and degree 1355 credentials of value for approval by the state board and 1356 inclusion in the Master Credentials List. Such credentials must 1357 include registered apprenticeship programs; industry 1358 certifications, including industry certifications for 1359 agricultural occupations submitted pursuant to s. 570.07(43); 1360 licenses; advanced technical certificates; college credit 1361 certificates; career certificates; applied technology diplomas; 1362 associate degrees; baccalaureate degrees; and graduate degrees. 1363 The Credentials Review Committee must include: 1364 a.âThe Chancellor of the Division of Public Schools. 1365 b.âThe Chancellor of the Division of Career and Adult 1366 Education. 1367 c.âThe Chancellor of the Florida College System. 1368 d.âThe Chancellor of the State University System. 1369 e.âThe director of the Office of Reimagining Education and 1370 Career Help, who shall serve as chair of the committee. 1371 f.âFour members from local workforce development boards, 1372 with equal representation from urban and rural regions. 1373 g.âTwo members from nonpublic postsecondary institutions. 1374 h.âTwo members from industry associations. 1375 i.âTwo members from Florida-based businesses. 1376 j.âTwo members from the Department of Commerce. 1377 k.âOne member from the Department of Agriculture and 1378 Consumer Services. 1379 2.âAll information pertaining to the Credentials Review 1380 Committee, the process for the approval of credentials of value, 1381 and the Master Credentials List must be made available and be 1382 easily accessible to the public on all relevant state agency 1383 websites. 1384 3.âThe Credentials Review Committee shall establish a 1385 definition for credentials of value and create a framework of 1386 quality. The framework must align with federally funded 1387 workforce accountability requirements and undergo biennial 1388 review. 1389 4.âThe criteria to determine value for nondegree 1390 credentials should, at a minimum, require: 1391 a.âEvidence that the credential meets labor market demand 1392 as identified by the Labor Market Statistics Center within the 1393 Department of Commerce or the Labor Market Estimating Conference 1394 created in s. 216.136, or meets local demand as identified in 1395 the criteria adopted by the Credentials Review Committee. The 1396 Credentials Review Committee may consider additional evidence to 1397 determine labor market demand for credentials for agricultural 1398 occupations. Evidence to be considered by the Credentials Review 1399 Committee must include employer information on present 1400 credential use or emerging opportunities. 1401 b.âEvidence that the competencies mastered upon completion 1402 of the credential are aligned with labor market demand. 1403 c.âEvidence of the employment and earnings outcomes for 1404 individuals after obtaining the credential. Earnings outcomes 1405 must provide middle-level to high-level wages with preference 1406 given to credentials generating high-level wages. Credentials 1407 that do not meet the earnings outcomes criteria must be part of 1408 a sequence of credentials that are required for the next level 1409 occupation that does meet the earnings outcomes criteria in 1410 order to be identified as a credential of value. For new 1411 credentials, this criteria may be met with conditional 1412 eligibility until measurable labor market outcomes are obtained. 1413 5.âThe Credentials Review Committee shall establish the 1414 criteria to determine value for degree programs. This criteria 1415 must include evidence that the program meets statewide or 1416 regional labor market demand as identified by the Labor Market 1417 Statistics Center within the Department of Commerce or the Labor 1418 Market Estimating Conference created in s. 216.136, or meets 1419 local demand as determined by the committee. The Credentials 1420 Review Committee may consider additional evidence to determine 1421 labor market demand for credentials for agricultural 1422 occupations. Such criteria, once available and applicable to 1423 baccalaureate degrees and graduate degrees, must be used to 1424 designate programs of emphasis under s. 1001.706 and to guide 1425 the development of program standards and benchmarks under s. 1426 1004.92. 1427 6.âThe Credentials Review Committee shall establish a 1428 process for prioritizing nondegree credentials and degree 1429 programs based on critical statewide or regional shortages. 1430 7.âThe Credentials Review Committee shall establish a 1431 process for: 1432 a.âAt a minimum, quarterly review and approval of 1433 credential applications. Approved credentials of value shall be 1434 used by the committee to develop the Master Credentials List. 1435 b.âAnnual review of the Master Credentials List. 1436 c.âPhasing out credentials on the Master Credentials List 1437 that no longer meet the framework of quality. Credentials must 1438 remain on the list for at least 1 year after identification for 1439 removal. 1440 d.âDesignating performance funding eligibility under ss. 1441 1011.80 and 1011.81, based upon the highest available 1442 certification for postsecondary students. 1443 e.âUpon approval, the state board shall submit the Master 1444 Credentials List to the State Board of Education. The list must, 1445 at a minimum, identify nondegree credentials and degree programs 1446 determined to be of value for purposes of the CAPE Industry 1447 Certification Funding List adopted under s. 1008.44 ss. 1008.44 1448 and 1011.62(1); if the credential or degree program meets 1449 statewide, regional, or local level demand; the type of 1450 certificate, credential, or degree; and the primary standard 1451 occupation classification code. 1452 f.âIf an application submitted to the Credentials Review 1453 Committee does not meet the required standards, the Credentials 1454 Review Committee must provide a notice of deficiency to the 1455 applicant and the provider who was identified as the point of 1456 contact provided on the application by the end of the next 1457 quarter after receipt of the application. The notice must 1458 include the basis for denial and the procedure to appeal the 1459 denial. 1460 8.âThe Credentials Review Committee shall establish a 1461 process for linking Classifications of Instructional Programs 1462 (CIP) to Standard Occupational Classifications (SOC) for all new 1463 credentials of value identified on the Master Credentials List. 1464 The CIP code aligns instructional programs to occupations. A CIP 1465 to SOC link indicates that programs classified in the CIP code 1466 category prepare individuals for jobs classified in the SOC code 1467 category. The state board shall submit approved CIP to SOC 1468 linkages to the State Board of Education with each credential 1469 that is added to the Master Credentials List. 1470 9.âThe Credentials Review Committee shall identify all data 1471 elements necessary to collect information on credentials by the 1472 Florida Education and Training Placement Program automated 1473 system under s. 1008.39. 1474 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to the deletion of references 1475 to the CAPE Industry Certification Funding List in s. 1476 1011.62(1) by s. 17, ch. 2025-203, Laws of Florida. 1477 Section 37.âSubsection (3) of section 497.271, Florida 1478 Statutes, is amended to read: 1479 497.271âStandards for construction and significant 1480 alteration or renovation of mausoleums and columbaria.â 1481 (3)âThe licensing authority shall transmit the rules as 1482 adopted under subsection (2), referred to as the âmausoleum 1483 standards,â to the Florida Building Commission, which shall 1484 initiate rulemaking under chapter 120 to consider such mausoleum 1485 standards. If such mausoleum standards are not deemed 1486 acceptable, they must be returned by the Florida Building 1487 Commission to the licensing authority with details of changes 1488 needed to make them acceptable. If such mausoleum standards are 1489 acceptable, the Florida Building Commission must adopt a rule 1490 designating the mausoleum standards as an approved revision to 1491 the State Minimum Building Codes under part IV of chapter 553. 1492 When designated by the Florida Building Commission, such 1493 mausoleum standards shall become a required element of the State 1494 Minimum Building Codes under s. 553.73(2) s. 553.73(2)(a) and 1495 shall be transmitted to each local enforcement agency, as 1496 defined in s. 553.71(5). Such local enforcement agency shall 1497 consider and inspect for compliance with such mausoleum 1498 standards as if they were part of the local building code, but 1499 shall have no continuing duty to inspect after final approval of 1500 the construction pursuant to the local building code. Any 1501 further amendments to the mausoleum standards shall be 1502 accomplished by the same procedure. Such designated mausoleum 1503 standards, as from time to time amended, shall be a part of the 1504 State Minimum Building Codes under s. 553.73 until the adoption 1505 and effective date of a new statewide uniform minimum building 1506 code, which may supersede the mausoleum standards as provided by 1507 the law enacting the new statewide uniform minimum building 1508 code. 1509 Reviserâs note.âAmended to correct a scrivenerâs error in 1510 Engrossed C.S. for C.S. for C.S. for H.B. 683, which became 1511 ch. 2025-140, Laws of Florida; that version deleted an 1512 earlier bill version amendment adding paragraphs to s. 1513 553.72(2) but neglected to correct a cross-reference to 1514 that provision updated in the earlier version. 1515 Section 38.âSubsection (2) of section 570.321, Florida 1516 Statutes, is amended to read: 1517 570.321âPlant Industry Trust Fund.â 1518 (2)âFunds to be credited to and uses of the trust fund 1519 shall be administered in accordance with ss. 581.031, 581.141, 1520 581.211, 581.212, 586.045, 586.15, and 586.16, 593.114, and 1521 593.117. 1522 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to the repeal of ss. 593.114 1523 and 593.117 by s. 68, ch. 2025-22, Laws of Florida. 1524 Section 39.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 1525 599.012, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1526 599.012âFlorida Wine Trust Fund; creation.â 1527 (1)âThere is established the Florida Wine Trust Fund within 1528 the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. The 1529 department shall use the moneys deposited in the trust fund 1530 pursuant to subsection (2) to do all the following: 1531 (a)âDevelop and coordinate the implementation of the State 1532 Wine Viticulture Plan. 1533 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution to 1534 conform to the renaming of the plan by s. 71, ch. 2025-22, 1535 Laws of Florida. 1536 Section 40.âSubsection (4) of section 679.3171, Florida 1537 Statutes, is amended to read: 1538 679.3171âInterests that take priority over or take free of 1539 security interest or agricultural lien.â 1540 (4)âSubject to subsections (6)-(8), a licensee of a general 1541 intangible or a buyer, other than a secured party, of collateral 1542 other than electronic money, tangible documents, goods, 1543 instruments, tangible documents, or a certificated security 1544 takes free of a security interest if the licensee or buyer gives 1545 value without knowledge of the security interest and before it 1546 is perfected. 1547 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial deletion to 1548 remove duplicative language. 1549 Section 41.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 1550 679.613, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1551 679.613âContents and form of notification before 1552 disposition of collateral; general.âExcept in a consumer-goods 1553 transaction, the following rules apply: 1554 (3)âThe contents of a notification providing substantially 1555 the information specified in subsection (1) are sufficient, even 1556 if the notification includes: 1557 (a)âInformation not specified by that subsection paragraph; 1558 or 1559 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to context. 1560 Section 42.âParagraph (d) of subsection (1) and paragraph 1561 (g) of subsection (12) of section 718.111, Florida Statutes, are 1562 amended to read: 1563 718.111âThe association.â 1564 (1)âCORPORATE ENTITY.â 1565 (d)âAs required by s. 617.0830, an officer, director, or 1566 agent shall discharge his or her duties in good faith, with the 1567 care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would 1568 exercise under similar circumstances, and in a manner he or she 1569 reasonably believes to be in the interests of the association. 1570 An officer, director, or agent shall be liable for monetary 1571 damages as provided in s. 617.0834 if such officer, director, or 1572 agent breached or failed to perform his or her duties and the 1573 breach of, or failure to perform, his or her duties constitutes 1574 a violation of criminal law as provided in s. 617.0834; 1575 constitutes a transaction from which the officer or director 1576 derived an improper personal benefit, either directly or 1577 indirectly; or constitutes recklessness or an act or omission 1578 that was in bad faith, with malicious purpose, or in a manner 1579 exhibiting wanton and willful disregard of human rights, safety, 1580 or property. Forgery of a ballot envelope or voting certificate 1581 used in a condominium association election is punishable as 1582 provided in s. 831.01, the theft or embezzlement of funds of a 1583 condominium association is punishable as provided in s. 812.014, 1584 and the destruction of or the refusal to allow inspection or 1585 copying of an official record of a condominium association that 1586 is accessible to unit owners within the time periods required by 1587 general law in furtherance of any crime is punishable as 1588 tampering with physical evidence as provided in s. 918.13 or as 1589 obstruction of justice as provided in chapter 843. An officer or 1590 director charged by information or indictment with a crime 1591 referenced in this paragraph must be removed from office, and 1592 the vacancy shall be filled as provided in s. 718.112(2)(d)3. s. 1593 718.112(2)(d)2. until the end of the officerâs or directorâs 1594 period of suspension or the end of his or her term of office, 1595 whichever occurs first. If a criminal charge is pending against 1596 the officer or director, he or she may not be appointed or 1597 elected to a position as an officer or a director of any 1598 association and may not have access to the official records of 1599 any association, except pursuant to a court order. However, if 1600 the charges are resolved without a finding of guilt, the officer 1601 or director must be reinstated for the remainder of his or her 1602 term of office, if any. 1603 (12)âOFFICIAL RECORDS.â 1604 (g)1.âAn association managing a condominium with 25 or more 1605 units which does not contain timeshare units shall post digital 1606 copies of the documents specified in subparagraph 2. on its 1607 website or make such documents available through an application 1608 that can be downloaded on a mobile device. Unless a shorter 1609 period is otherwise required, a document must be made available 1610 on the associationâs website or made available for download 1611 through an application on a mobile device within 30 days after 1612 the association receives or creates an official record specified 1613 in subparagraph 2. 1614 a.âThe associationâs website or application must be: 1615 (I)âAn independent website, application, or web portal 1616 wholly owned and operated by the association; or 1617 (II)âA website, application, or web portal operated by a 1618 third-party provider with whom the association owns, leases, 1619 rents, or otherwise obtains the right to operate a web page, 1620 subpage, web portal, collection of subpages or web portals, or 1621 an application which is dedicated to the associationâs 1622 activities and on which required notices, records, and documents 1623 may be posted or made available by the association. 1624 b.âThe associationâs website or application must be 1625 accessible through the Internet and must contain a subpage, web 1626 portal, or other protected electronic location that is 1627 inaccessible to the general public and accessible only to unit 1628 owners and employees of the association. 1629 c.âUpon a unit ownerâs written request, the association 1630 must provide the unit owner with a username and password and 1631 access to the protected sections of the associationâs website or 1632 application which contain any notices, records, or documents 1633 that must be electronically provided. 1634 2.âA current copy of the following documents must be posted 1635 in digital format on the associationâs website or application: 1636 a.âThe recorded declaration of condominium of each 1637 condominium operated by the association and each amendment to 1638 each declaration. 1639 b.âThe recorded bylaws of the association and each 1640 amendment to the bylaws. 1641 c.âThe articles of incorporation of the association, or 1642 other documents creating the association, and each amendment to 1643 the articles of incorporation or other documents. The copy 1644 posted pursuant to this sub-subparagraph must be a copy of the 1645 articles of incorporation filed with the Department of State. 1646 d.âThe rules of the association. 1647 e.âThe approved minutes of all board of administration 1648 meetings over the preceding 12 months. 1649 f.âThe video recording or a hyperlink to the video 1650 recording for all meetings of the association, the board of 1651 administration, any committee, and the unit owners which are 1652 conducted by video conference over the preceding 12 months. 1653 g.âA list of all executory contracts or documents to which 1654 the association is a party or under which the association or the 1655 unit owners have an obligation or responsibility and, after 1656 bidding for the related materials, equipment, or services has 1657 closed, a list of bids received by the association within the 1658 past year. Summaries of bids for materials, equipment, or 1659 services which exceed $500 must be maintained on the website or 1660 application for 1 year. In lieu of summaries, complete copies of 1661 the bids may be posted. 1662 h.âThe annual budget required by s. 718.112(2)(f) and any 1663 proposed budget to be considered at the annual meeting. 1664 i.âThe financial report required by subsection (13) and any 1665 monthly income or expense statement to be considered at a 1666 meeting. 1667 j.âThe certification of each director required by s. 1668 718.112(2)(d)5.b. s. 718.112(2)(d)4.b. 1669 k.âAll contracts or transactions between the association 1670 and any director, officer, corporation, firm, or association 1671 that is not an affiliated condominium association or any other 1672 entity in which an association director is also a director or 1673 officer and financially interested. 1674 l.âAny contract or document regarding a conflict of 1675 interest or possible conflict of interest as provided in ss. 1676 468.4335, 468.436(2)(b)6., and 718.3027(3). 1677 m.âThe notice of any unit owner meeting and the agenda for 1678 the meeting, as required by s. 718.112(2)(d)4. s. 1679 718.112(2)(d)3., no later than 14 days before the meeting. The 1680 notice must be posted in plain view on the front page of the 1681 website or application, or on a separate subpage of the website 1682 or application labeled âNoticesâ which is conspicuously visible 1683 and linked from the front page. The association must also post 1684 on its website or application any document to be considered and 1685 voted on by the owners during the meeting or any document listed 1686 on the agenda at least 7 days before the meeting at which the 1687 document or the information within the document will be 1688 considered. 1689 n.âNotice of any board meeting, the agenda, and any other 1690 document required for the meeting as required by s. 1691 718.112(2)(c), which must be posted no later than the date 1692 required for notice under s. 718.112(2)(c). 1693 o.âThe inspection reports described in ss. 553.899 and 1694 718.301(4)(p) and any other inspection report relating to a 1695 structural or life safety inspection of condominium property. 1696 p.âThe associationâs most recent structural integrity 1697 reserve study, if applicable. 1698 q.âCopies of all building permits issued for ongoing or 1699 planned construction. 1700 r.âA copy of all affidavits required by this chapter. 1701 3.âThe association shall ensure that the information and 1702 records described in paragraph (c), which are not allowed to be 1703 accessible to unit owners, are not posted on the associationâs 1704 website or application. If protected information or information 1705 restricted from being accessible to unit owners is included in 1706 documents that are required to be posted on the associationâs 1707 website or application, the association shall ensure the 1708 information is redacted before posting the documents. 1709 Notwithstanding the foregoing, the association or its agent is 1710 not liable for disclosing information that is protected or 1711 restricted under this paragraph unless such disclosure was made 1712 with a knowing or intentional disregard of the protected or 1713 restricted nature of such information. 1714 4.âThe failure of the association to post information 1715 required under subparagraph 2. is not in and of itself 1716 sufficient to invalidate any action or decision of the 1717 associationâs board or its committees. 1718 Reviserâs note.âAmended to correct cross-references to conform 1719 to the redesignation of subunits in s. 718.112(2)(d) by s. 1720 8, ch. 2025-175, Laws of Florida. 1721 Section 43.âParagraphs (b) and (d) of subsection (2) of 1722 section 718.112, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1723 718.112âBylaws.â 1724 (2)âREQUIRED PROVISIONS.âThe bylaws shall provide for the 1725 following and, if they do not do so, shall be deemed to include 1726 the following: 1727 (b)âQuorum; voting requirements; proxies.â 1728 1.âUnless a lower number is provided in the bylaws, the 1729 percentage of voting interests required to constitute a quorum 1730 at a meeting of the members is a majority of the voting 1731 interests. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or in the 1732 declaration, articles of incorporation, or bylaws, and except as 1733 provided in subparagraph (d)5. (d)4., decisions shall be made by 1734 a majority of the voting interests represented at a meeting at 1735 which a quorum is present. 1736 2.âExcept as specifically otherwise provided herein, unit 1737 owners in a residential condominium may not vote by general 1738 proxy, but may vote by limited proxies substantially conforming 1739 to a limited proxy form adopted by the division. A voting 1740 interest or consent right allocated to a unit owned by the 1741 association may not be exercised or considered for any purpose, 1742 whether for a quorum, an election, or otherwise. Limited proxies 1743 and general proxies may be used to establish a quorum. Limited 1744 proxies shall be used for votes taken to waive or reduce 1745 reserves in accordance with subparagraph (f)2.; for votes taken 1746 to waive the financial reporting requirements of s. 718.111(13); 1747 for votes taken to amend the declaration pursuant to s. 718.110; 1748 for votes taken to amend the articles of incorporation or bylaws 1749 pursuant to this section; and for any other matter for which 1750 this chapter requires or permits a vote of the unit owners. 1751 Except as provided in paragraph (d), a proxy, limited or 1752 general, may not be used in the election of board members in a 1753 residential condominium. General proxies may be used for other 1754 matters for which limited proxies are not required, and may be 1755 used in voting for nonsubstantive changes to items for which a 1756 limited proxy is required and given. Notwithstanding this 1757 subparagraph, unit owners may vote in person at unit owner 1758 meetings. This subparagraph does not limit the use of general 1759 proxies or require the use of limited proxies for any agenda 1760 item or election at any meeting of a timeshare condominium 1761 association or a nonresidential condominium association. 1762 3.âA proxy given is effective only for the specific meeting 1763 for which originally given and any lawfully adjourned meetings 1764 thereof. A proxy is not valid longer than 90 days after the date 1765 of the first meeting for which it was given. Each proxy is 1766 revocable at any time at the pleasure of the unit owner 1767 executing it. 1768 4.âA member of the board of administration or a committee 1769 may submit in writing his or her agreement or disagreement with 1770 any action taken at a meeting that the member did not attend. 1771 This agreement or disagreement may not be used as a vote for or 1772 against the action taken or to create a quorum. 1773 5.âA board meeting may be conducted in person or by video 1774 conference. A board or committee memberâs participation in a 1775 meeting via telephone, real-time videoconferencing, or similar 1776 real-time electronic or video communication counts toward a 1777 quorum, and such member may vote as if physically present. A 1778 speaker must be used so that the conversation of such members 1779 may be heard by the board or committee members attending in 1780 person as well as by any unit owners present at a meeting. The 1781 division shall adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536 and 120.54 1782 governing the requirements for meetings. 1783 (d)âUnit owner meetings.â 1784 1.âAn annual meeting of the unit owners must be held at the 1785 location provided in the association bylaws and, if the bylaws 1786 are silent as to the location, the meeting must be held within 1787 15 miles of the condominium property or within the same county 1788 as the condominium property. However, such distance requirement 1789 does not apply to an association governing a timeshare 1790 condominium. If a unit owner meeting is conducted via video 1791 conference, a unit owner may vote electronically in the manner 1792 provided in s. 718.128. 1793 2.âUnit owner meetings, including the annual meeting of the 1794 unit owners, may be conducted in person or via video conference. 1795 If the annual meeting of the unit owners is conducted via video 1796 conference, a quorum of the members of the board of 1797 administration must be physically present at the physical 1798 location where unit owners can attend the meeting. The location 1799 must be provided in the association bylaws and, if the bylaws 1800 are silent as to the location, the meeting must be held within 1801 15 miles of the condominium property or within the same county 1802 as the condominium property. If the unit owner meeting is 1803 conducted via video conference, the video conference must be 1804 recorded and such recording must be maintained as an official 1805 record of the association. The division shall adopt rules 1806 pursuant to ss. 120.536 and 120.54 governing the requirements 1807 for meetings. 1808 3.âUnless the bylaws provide otherwise, a vacancy on the 1809 board caused by the expiration of a directorâs term must be 1810 filled by electing a new board member, and the election must be 1811 by secret ballot. An election is not required if the number of 1812 vacancies equals or exceeds the number of candidates. For 1813 purposes of this paragraph, the term âcandidateâ means an 1814 eligible person who has timely submitted the written notice, as 1815 described in sub-subparagraph 5.a. 4.a., of his or her intention 1816 to become a candidate. Except in a timeshare or nonresidential 1817 condominium, or if the staggered term of a board member does not 1818 expire until a later annual meeting, or if all membersâ terms 1819 would otherwise expire but there are no candidates, the terms of 1820 all board members expire at the annual meeting, and such members 1821 may stand for reelection unless prohibited by the bylaws. Board 1822 members may serve terms longer than 1 year if permitted by the 1823 bylaws or articles of incorporation. A board member may not 1824 serve more than 8 consecutive years unless approved by an 1825 affirmative vote of unit owners representing two-thirds of all 1826 votes cast in the election or unless there are not enough 1827 eligible candidates to fill the vacancies on the board at the 1828 time of the vacancy. Only board service that occurs on or after 1829 July 1, 2018, may be used when calculating a board memberâs term 1830 limit. If the number of board members whose terms expire at the 1831 annual meeting equals or exceeds the number of candidates, the 1832 candidates become members of the board effective upon the 1833 adjournment of the annual meeting. Unless the bylaws provide 1834 otherwise, any remaining vacancies shall be filled by the 1835 affirmative vote of the majority of the directors making up the 1836 newly constituted board even if the directors constitute less 1837 than a quorum or there is only one director. In a residential 1838 condominium association of more than 10 units or in a 1839 residential condominium association that does not include 1840 timeshare units or timeshare interests, co-owners of a unit may 1841 not serve as members of the board of directors at the same time 1842 unless they own more than one unit or unless there are not 1843 enough eligible candidates to fill the vacancies on the board at 1844 the time of the vacancy. A unit owner in a residential 1845 condominium desiring to be a candidate for board membership must 1846 comply with sub-subparagraph 5.a. 4.a. and must be eligible to 1847 be a candidate to serve on the board of directors at the time of 1848 the deadline for submitting a notice of intent to run in order 1849 to have his or her name listed as a proper candidate on the 1850 ballot or to serve on the board. A person who has been suspended 1851 or removed by the division under this chapter, or who is 1852 delinquent in the payment of any assessment due to the 1853 association, is not eligible to be a candidate for board 1854 membership and may not be listed on the ballot. For purposes of 1855 this paragraph, a person is delinquent if a payment is not made 1856 by the due date as specifically identified in the declaration of 1857 condominium, bylaws, or articles of incorporation. If a due date 1858 is not specifically identified in the declaration of 1859 condominium, bylaws, or articles of incorporation, the due date 1860 is the first day of the assessment period. A person who has been 1861 convicted of any felony in this state or in a United States 1862 District or Territorial Court, or who has been convicted of any 1863 offense in another jurisdiction which would be considered a 1864 felony if committed in this state, is not eligible for board 1865 membership unless such felonâs civil rights have been restored 1866 for at least 5 years as of the date such person seeks election 1867 to the board. The validity of an action by the board is not 1868 affected if it is later determined that a board member is 1869 ineligible for board membership due to having been convicted of 1870 a felony. This subparagraph does not limit the term of a member 1871 of the board of a nonresidential or timeshare condominium. 1872 4.âThe bylaws must provide the method of calling meetings 1873 of unit owners, including annual meetings. Written notice of an 1874 annual meeting must include an agenda; be mailed, hand 1875 delivered, or electronically transmitted to each unit owner at 1876 least 14 days before the annual meeting; and be posted in a 1877 conspicuous place on the condominium property or association 1878 property at least 14 continuous days before the annual meeting. 1879 Written notice of a meeting other than an annual meeting must 1880 include an agenda; be mailed, hand delivered, or electronically 1881 transmitted to each unit owner; and be posted in a conspicuous 1882 place on the condominium property or association property within 1883 the timeframe specified in the bylaws. If the bylaws do not 1884 specify a timeframe for written notice of a meeting other than 1885 an annual meeting, notice must be provided at least 14 1886 continuous days before the meeting. Upon notice to the unit 1887 owners, the board shall, by duly adopted rule, designate a 1888 specific location on the condominium property or association 1889 property at which all notices of unit owner meetings must be 1890 posted. This requirement does not apply if there is no 1891 condominium property for posting notices. In addition to the 1892 physical posting of meeting notices, the association may, by 1893 reasonable rule, adopt a procedure for conspicuously posting and 1894 repeatedly broadcasting the notice and the agenda on a closed 1895 circuit cable television system serving the condominium 1896 association. If broadcast notice is provided, the notice and 1897 agenda must be broadcast in a manner and for a sufficient 1898 continuous length of time so as to allow an average reader to 1899 observe the notice and read and comprehend the entire content of 1900 the notice and the agenda. In addition to any of the authorized 1901 means of providing notice of a meeting of the board, the 1902 association may, by rule, adopt a procedure for conspicuously 1903 posting the meeting notice and the agenda on a website serving 1904 the condominium association for at least the minimum period of 1905 time for which a notice of a meeting is also required to be 1906 physically posted on the condominium property. Any rule adopted 1907 shall, in addition to other matters, include a requirement that 1908 the association send an electronic notice in the same manner as 1909 a notice for a meeting of the members, which must include a 1910 hyperlink to the website at which the notice is posted, to unit 1911 owners whose e-mail addresses are included in the associationâs 1912 official records. Unless a unit owner waives in writing the 1913 right to receive notice of the annual meeting, such notice must 1914 be hand delivered, mailed, or electronically transmitted to each 1915 unit owner. Notice for meetings and notice for all other 1916 purposes must be mailed to each unit owner at the address last 1917 furnished to the association by the unit owner, or hand 1918 delivered to each unit owner. However, if a unit is owned by 1919 more than one person, the association must provide notice to the 1920 address that the developer identifies for that purpose and 1921 thereafter as one or more of the owners of the unit advise the 1922 association in writing, or if no address is given or the owners 1923 of the unit do not agree, to the address provided on the deed of 1924 record. An officer of the association, or the manager or other 1925 person providing notice of the association meeting, must provide 1926 an affidavit or United States Postal Service certificate of 1927 mailing, to be included in the official records of the 1928 association affirming that the notice was mailed or hand 1929 delivered in accordance with this provision. 1930 5.âThe members of the board of a residential condominium 1931 shall be elected by written ballot or voting machine. Proxies 1932 may not be used in electing the board in general elections or 1933 elections to fill vacancies caused by recall, resignation, or 1934 otherwise, unless otherwise provided in this chapter. This 1935 subparagraph does not apply to an association governing a 1936 timeshare condominium. 1937 a.âAt least 60 days before a scheduled election, the 1938 association shall mail, deliver, or electronically transmit, by 1939 separate association mailing or included in another association 1940 mailing, delivery, or transmission, including regularly 1941 published newsletters, to each unit owner entitled to a vote, a 1942 first notice of the date of the election. A unit owner or other 1943 eligible person desiring to be a candidate for the board must 1944 give written notice of his or her intent to be a candidate to 1945 the association at least 40 days before a scheduled election. 1946 Together with the written notice and agenda as set forth in 1947 subparagraph 4. 3., the association shall mail, deliver, or 1948 electronically transmit a second notice of the election to all 1949 unit owners entitled to vote, together with a ballot that lists 1950 all candidates not less than 14 days or more than 34 days before 1951 the date of the election. Upon request of a candidate, an 1952 information sheet, no larger than 8 1/2 inches by 11 inches, 1953 which must be furnished by the candidate at least 35 days before 1954 the election, must be included with the mailing, delivery, or 1955 transmission of the ballot, with the costs of mailing, delivery, 1956 or electronic transmission and copying to be borne by the 1957 association. The association is not liable for the contents of 1958 the information sheets prepared by the candidates. In order to 1959 reduce costs, the association may print or duplicate the 1960 information sheets on both sides of the paper. The division 1961 shall by rule establish voting procedures consistent with this 1962 sub-subparagraph, including rules establishing procedures for 1963 giving notice by electronic transmission and rules providing for 1964 the secrecy of ballots. Elections shall be decided by a 1965 plurality of ballots cast. There is no quorum requirement; 1966 however, at least 20 percent of the eligible voters must cast a 1967 ballot in order to have a valid election. A unit owner may not 1968 authorize any other person to vote his or her ballot, and any 1969 ballots improperly cast are invalid. A unit owner who violates 1970 this provision may be fined by the association in accordance 1971 with s. 718.303. A unit owner who needs assistance in casting 1972 the ballot for the reasons stated in s. 101.051 may obtain such 1973 assistance. The regular election must occur on the date of the 1974 annual meeting. Notwithstanding this sub-subparagraph, an 1975 election is not required unless more candidates file notices of 1976 intent to run or are nominated than board vacancies exist. 1977 b.âA director of a board of an association of a residential 1978 condominium shall: 1979 (I)âCertify in writing to the secretary of the association 1980 that he or she has read the associationâs declaration of 1981 condominium, articles of incorporation, bylaws, and current 1982 written policies; that he or she will work to uphold such 1983 documents and policies to the best of his or her ability; and 1984 that he or she will faithfully discharge his or her fiduciary 1985 responsibility to the associationâs members. 1986 (II)âSubmit to the secretary of the association a 1987 certificate of having satisfactorily completed the educational 1988 curriculum administered by the division or a division-approved 1989 condominium education provider. The educational curriculum must 1990 be at least 4 hours long and include instruction on milestone 1991 inspections, structural integrity reserve studies, elections, 1992 recordkeeping, financial literacy and transparency, levying of 1993 fines, and notice and meeting requirements. 1994 1995 Each newly elected or appointed director must submit to the 1996 secretary of the association the written certification and 1997 educational certificate within 1 year before being elected or 1998 appointed or 90 days after the date of election or appointment. 1999 A director of an association of a residential condominium who 2000 was elected or appointed before July 1, 2024, must comply with 2001 the written certification and educational certificate 2002 requirements in this sub-subparagraph by June 30, 2025. The 2003 written certification and educational certificate is valid for 7 2004 years after the date of issuance and does not have to be 2005 resubmitted as long as the director serves on the board without 2006 interruption during the 7-year period. A director who is 2007 appointed by the developer may satisfy the educational 2008 certificate requirement in sub-sub-subparagraph (II) for any 2009 subsequent appointment to a board by a developer within 7 years 2010 after the date of issuance of the most recent educational 2011 certificate, including any interruption of service on a board or 2012 appointment to a board in another association within that 7-year 2013 period. One year after submission of the most recent written 2014 certification and educational certificate, and annually 2015 thereafter, a director of an association of a residential 2016 condominium must submit to the secretary of the association a 2017 certificate of having satisfactorily completed at least 1 hour 2018 of continuing education administered by the division, or a 2019 division-approved condominium education provider, relating to 2020 any recent changes to this chapter and the related 2021 administrative rules during the past year. A director of an 2022 association of a residential condominium who fails to timely 2023 file the written certification and educational certificate is 2024 suspended from service on the board until he or she complies 2025 with this sub-subparagraph. The board may temporarily fill the 2026 vacancy during the period of suspension. The secretary shall 2027 cause the association to retain a directorâs written 2028 certification and educational certificate for inspection by the 2029 members for 7 years after a directorâs election or the duration 2030 of the directorâs uninterrupted tenure, whichever is longer. 2031 Failure to have such written certification and educational 2032 certificate on file does not affect the validity of any board 2033 action. 2034 c.âAny challenge to the election process must be commenced 2035 within 60 days after the election results are announced. 2036 6.âAny approval by unit owners called for by this chapter 2037 or the applicable declaration or bylaws, including, but not 2038 limited to, the approval requirement in s. 718.111(8), must be 2039 made at a duly noticed meeting of unit owners and is subject to 2040 all requirements of this chapter or the applicable condominium 2041 documents relating to unit owner decisionmaking, except that 2042 unit owners may take action by written agreement, without 2043 meetings, on matters for which action by written agreement 2044 without meetings is expressly allowed by the applicable bylaws 2045 or declaration or any law that provides for such action. 2046 7.âUnit owners may waive notice of specific meetings if 2047 allowed by the applicable bylaws or declaration or any law. 2048 Notice of meetings of the board of administration; unit owner 2049 meetings, except unit owner meetings called to recall board 2050 members under paragraph (l); and committee meetings may be given 2051 by electronic transmission to unit owners who consent to receive 2052 notice by electronic transmission. A unit owner who consents to 2053 receiving notices by electronic transmission is solely 2054 responsible for removing or bypassing filters that block receipt 2055 of mass e-mails sent to members on behalf of the association in 2056 the course of giving electronic notices. 2057 8.âUnit owners have the right to participate in meetings of 2058 unit owners with reference to all designated agenda items. 2059 However, the association may adopt reasonable rules governing 2060 the frequency, duration, and manner of unit owner participation. 2061 9.âA unit owner may tape record or videotape a meeting of 2062 the unit owners subject to reasonable rules adopted by the 2063 division. 2064 10.âUnless otherwise provided in the bylaws, any vacancy 2065 occurring on the board before the expiration of a term may be 2066 filled by the affirmative vote of the majority of the remaining 2067 directors, even if the remaining directors constitute less than 2068 a quorum, or by the sole remaining director. In the alternative, 2069 a board may hold an election to fill the vacancy, in which case 2070 the election procedures must conform to sub-subparagraph 5.a. 2071 4.a. unless the association governs 10 units or fewer and has 2072 opted out of the statutory election process, in which case the 2073 bylaws of the association control. Unless otherwise provided in 2074 the bylaws, a board member appointed or elected under this 2075 section shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term of the 2076 seat being filled. Filling vacancies created by recall is 2077 governed by paragraph (l) and rules adopted by the division. 2078 11.âThis chapter does not limit the use of general or 2079 limited proxies, require the use of general or limited proxies, 2080 or require the use of a written ballot or voting machine for any 2081 agenda item or election at any meeting of a timeshare 2082 condominium association or nonresidential condominium 2083 association. 2084 2085 Notwithstanding subparagraph (b)2. and sub-subparagraph 5.a. 2086 4.a., an association of 10 or fewer units may, by affirmative 2087 vote of a majority of the total voting interests, provide for 2088 different voting and election procedures in its bylaws, which 2089 may be by a proxy specifically delineating the different voting 2090 and election procedures. The different voting and election 2091 procedures may provide for elections to be conducted by limited 2092 or general proxy. 2093 Reviserâs note.âAmended to correct cross-references to conform 2094 to the redesignation of subunits in paragraph (2)(d) by s. 2095 8, ch. 2025-175, Laws of Florida. 2096 Section 44.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 2097 718.501, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2098 718.501âAuthority, responsibility, and duties of Division 2099 of Florida Condominiums, Timeshares, and Mobile Homes.â 2100 (2) 2101 (c)âOn the certification form provided by the division, the 2102 directors of the association shall certify that each director of 2103 the association has completed the written certification and 2104 educational certificate requirements in s. 718.112(2)(d)5.b. s. 2105 718.112(2)(d)4.b. This certification requirement does not apply 2106 to the directors of an association governing a timeshare 2107 condominium. 2108 Reviserâs note.âAmended to correct a cross-reference to conform 2109 to the redesignation of subunits in s. 718.112(2)(d) by s. 2110 8, ch. 2025-175, Laws of Florida. 2111 Section 45.âParagraph (d) of subsection (1) and paragraph 2112 (e) of subsection (2) of section 718.503, Florida Statutes, are 2113 amended to read: 2114 718.503âDeveloper disclosure prior to sale; nondeveloper 2115 unit owner disclosure prior to sale; voidability.â 2116 (1)âDEVELOPER DISCLOSURE.â 2117 (d)âMilestone inspection, turnover inspection report, or 2118 structural integrity reserve study.âIf the association is 2119 required to have completed a milestone inspection as described 2120 in s. 553.899, a turnover inspection report for a turnover 2121 inspection performed on or after July 1, 2023, or a structural 2122 integrity reserve study, and the association has not completed 2123 the milestone inspection, the turnover inspection report, or the 2124 structural integrity reserve study, each contract entered into 2125 after December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit 2126 shall contain in conspicuous type a statement indicating that 2127 the association is required to have a milestone inspection, a 2128 turnover inspection report, or a structural integrity reserve 2129 study and has not completed such inspection, report, or study, 2130 as appropriate. If the association is not required to have a 2131 milestone inspection as described in s. 553.899 or a structural 2132 integrity reserve study, each contract entered into after 2133 December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit shall 2134 contain in conspicuous type a statement indicating that the 2135 association is not required to have a milestone inspection or a 2136 structural integrity reserve study, as appropriate. If the 2137 association has completed a milestone inspection as described in 2138 s. 553.899, a turnover inspection report for a turnover 2139 inspection performed on or after July 1, 2023, or a structural 2140 integrity reserve study, each contract entered into after 2141 December 31, 2024, for the sale of a residential unit shall 2142 contain in conspicuous type: 2143 1.âA clause which states: THE BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES 2144 THAT BUYER HAS BEEN PROVIDED A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR 2145 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED 2146 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF 2147 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 2148 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A 2149 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATIONâS MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY 2150 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(28) 718.103(26) AND 2151 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE, MORE THAN 15 2152 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE 2153 EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT; and 2154 2.âA clause which states: THIS AGREEMENT IS VOIDABLE BY 2155 BUYER BY DELIVERING WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYERâS INTENTION TO 2156 CANCEL WITHIN 15 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL 2157 HOLIDAYS, AFTER THE DATE OF EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT BY THE 2158 BUYER AND RECEIPT BY BUYER OF A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR 2159 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED 2160 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF 2161 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 2162 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A 2163 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATIONâS MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY 2164 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(28) 718.103(26) AND 2165 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE. ANY PURPORTED 2166 WAIVER OF THESE VOIDABILITY RIGHTS SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT. BUYER 2167 MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR CLOSING FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN 15 2168 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AFTER 2169 THE BUYER RECEIVES A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-PREPARED 2170 SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED IN 2171 SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES; A COPY OF THE TURNOVER 2172 INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), 2173 FLORIDA STATUTES; OR A COPY OF THE ASSOCIATIONâS MOST RECENT 2174 STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 2175 718.103(28) 718.103(26) AND 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF 2176 REQUESTED IN WRITING. BUYERâS RIGHT TO VOID THIS AGREEMENT SHALL 2177 TERMINATE AT CLOSING. 2178 2179 A contract that does not conform to the requirements of this 2180 paragraph is voidable at the option of the purchaser before 2181 closing. 2182 (2)âNONDEVELOPER DISCLOSURE.â 2183 (e)âIf the association is required to have completed a 2184 milestone inspection as described in s. 553.899, a turnover 2185 inspection report for a turnover inspection performed on or 2186 after July 1, 2023, or a structural integrity reserve study, and 2187 the association has not completed the milestone inspection, the 2188 turnover inspection report, or the structural integrity reserve 2189 study, each contract entered into after December 31, 2024, for 2190 the sale of a residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type 2191 a statement indicating that the association is required to have 2192 a milestone inspection, a turnover inspection report, or a 2193 structural integrity reserve study and has not completed such 2194 inspection, report, or study, as appropriate. If the association 2195 is not required to have a milestone inspection as described in 2196 s. 553.899 or a structural integrity reserve study, each 2197 contract entered into after December 31, 2024, for the sale of a 2198 residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type a statement 2199 indicating that the association is not required to have a 2200 milestone inspection or a structural integrity reserve study, as 2201 appropriate. If the association has completed a milestone 2202 inspection as described in s. 553.899, a turnover inspection 2203 report for a turnover inspection performed on or after July 1, 2204 2023, or a structural integrity reserve study, each contract 2205 entered into after December 31, 2024, for the resale of a 2206 residential unit shall contain in conspicuous type: 2207 1.âA clause which states: THE BUYER HEREBY ACKNOWLEDGES 2208 THAT BUYER HAS BEEN PROVIDED A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR 2209 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED 2210 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF 2211 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 2212 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A 2213 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATIONâS MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY 2214 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(28) 718.103(26) AND 2215 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE, MORE THAN 7 2216 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, BEFORE 2217 EXECUTION OF THIS CONTRACT; and 2218 2.âA clause which states: THIS AGREEMENT IS VOIDABLE BY 2219 BUYER BY DELIVERING WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE BUYERâS INTENTION TO 2220 CANCEL WITHIN 7 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL 2221 HOLIDAYS, AFTER THE DATE OF EXECUTION OF THIS AGREEMENT BY THE 2222 BUYER AND RECEIPT BY BUYER OF A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR 2223 PREPARED SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED 2224 IN SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; A COPY OF 2225 THE TURNOVER INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 2226 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE; AND A 2227 COPY OF THE ASSOCIATIONâS MOST RECENT STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY 2228 RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 718.103(28) 718.103(26) AND 2229 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF APPLICABLE. ANY PURPORTED 2230 WAIVER OF THESE VOIDABILITY RIGHTS SHALL BE OF NO EFFECT. BUYER 2231 MAY EXTEND THE TIME FOR CLOSING FOR A PERIOD OF NOT MORE THAN 7 2232 DAYS, EXCLUDING SATURDAYS, SUNDAYS, AND LEGAL HOLIDAYS, AFTER 2233 THE BUYER RECEIVES A CURRENT COPY OF THE INSPECTOR-PREPARED 2234 SUMMARY OF THE MILESTONE INSPECTION REPORT AS DESCRIBED IN 2235 SECTION 553.899, FLORIDA STATUTES; A COPY OF THE TURNOVER 2236 INSPECTION REPORT DESCRIBED IN SECTION 718.301(4)(p) AND (q), 2237 FLORIDA STATUTES; OR A COPY OF THE ASSOCIATIONâS MOST RECENT 2238 STRUCTURAL INTEGRITY RESERVE STUDY DESCRIBED IN SECTIONS 2239 718.103(28) 718.103(26) AND 718.112(2)(g), FLORIDA STATUTES, IF 2240 REQUESTED IN WRITING. BUYERâS RIGHT TO VOID THIS AGREEMENT SHALL 2241 TERMINATE AT CLOSING. 2242 2243 A contract that does not conform to the requirements of this 2244 paragraph is voidable at the option of the purchaser before 2245 closing. 2246 Reviserâs note.âAmended to correct a cross-reference to conform 2247 to the redesignation of subunits in s. 718.103 by s. 5, ch. 2248 2024-244, Laws of Florida. 2249 Section 46.âParagraph (j) of subsection (1) of section 2250 719.106, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2251 719.106âBylaws; cooperative ownership.â 2252 (1)âMANDATORY PROVISIONS.âThe bylaws or other cooperative 2253 documents shall provide for the following, and if they do not, 2254 they shall be deemed to include the following: 2255 (j)âAnnual budget.â 2256 1.âThe proposed annual budget of common expenses must be 2257 detailed and must show the amounts budgeted by accounts and 2258 expense classifications, including, if applicable, but not 2259 limited to, those expenses listed in s. 719.504(20). The board 2260 of administration shall adopt the annual budget at least 14 days 2261 before the start of the associationâs fiscal year. In the event 2262 that the board fails to timely adopt the annual budget a second 2263 time, it is deemed a minor violation and the prior yearâs budget 2264 shall continue in effect until a new budget is adopted. 2265 2.a.âIn addition to annual operating expenses, the budget 2266 must include reserve accounts for capital expenditures and 2267 deferred maintenance. These accounts must include, but not be 2268 limited to, roof replacement, building painting, and pavement 2269 resurfacing, regardless of the amount of deferred maintenance 2270 expense or replacement cost, and for any other items for which 2271 the deferred maintenance expense or replacement cost exceeds 2272 $25,000 or the inflation-adjusted amount determined by the 2273 division under subparagraph 6., whichever amount is greater. The 2274 amount to be reserved must be computed by means of a formula 2275 which is based upon estimated remaining useful life and 2276 estimated replacement cost or deferred maintenance expense of 2277 the reserve item. In a budget adopted by an association that is 2278 required to obtain a structural integrity reserve study, 2279 reserves must be maintained for the items identified in 2280 paragraph (k) for which the association is responsible pursuant 2281 to the declaration, and the reserve amount for such items must 2282 be based on the findings and recommendations of the 2283 associationâs most recent structural integrity reserve study. 2284 With respect to items for which an estimate of useful life is 2285 not readily ascertainable or with an estimated remaining useful 2286 life of greater than 25 years, an association is not required to 2287 reserve replacement costs for such items, but an association 2288 must reserve the amount of deferred maintenance expense, if any, 2289 which is recommended by the structural integrity reserve study 2290 for such items. The association may adjust replacement reserve 2291 assessments annually to take into account an inflation 2292 adjustment and any changes in estimates or extension of the 2293 useful life of a reserve item caused by deferred maintenance. 2294 b.âThe members of a unit-owner-controlled association may 2295 determine, by a majority vote of the total voting interests of 2296 the association, for a fiscal year to provide no reserves or 2297 reserves less adequate than required by this subsection. Before 2298 turnover of control of an association by a developer to unit 2299 owners other than a developer under s. 719.301, the developer 2300 controlled association may not vote to waive the reserves or 2301 reduce funding of the reserves. 2302 c.âFor a budget adopted on or after December 31, 2024, a 2303 unit-owner-controlled association that must obtain a structural 2304 integrity reserve study may not determine to provide no reserves 2305 or reserves less adequate than required by this paragraph for 2306 items listed in paragraph (k). If a meeting of the unit owners 2307 has been called to determine to provide no reserves, or reserves 2308 less adequate than required, and such result is not attained or 2309 a quorum is not attained, the reserves as included in the budget 2310 shall go into effect. 2311 d.âIf the local building official as defined in s. 468.603, 2312 determines that the entire cooperative building is uninhabitable 2313 due to a natural emergency as defined in s. 252.34, the board 2314 may pause the contribution to its reserves or reduce reserve 2315 funding until the local building official determines that the 2316 cooperative building is habitable. Any reserve account funds 2317 held by the association may be expended, pursuant to the boardâs 2318 determination, to make the cooperative building and its 2319 structures habitable. Upon the determination by the local 2320 building official that the cooperative building is habitable, 2321 the association must immediately resume contributing funds to 2322 its reserves. 2323 3.a.(I)âReserves for the items identified in paragraph (k) 2324 (g) may be funded by regular assessments, special assessments, 2325 lines of credit, or loans. A special assessment, a line of 2326 credit, or a loan under this sub-subparagraph requires the 2327 approval of a majority vote of the total voting interests of the 2328 association. 2329 (II)âA unit-owner-controlled association that is required 2330 to have a structural reserve study may secure a line of credit 2331 or a loan to fund capital expenses required by a milestone 2332 inspection under s. 553.899 or a structural integrity reserve 2333 study. The lines of credit or loans must be sufficient to fund 2334 the cumulative amount of any previously waived or unfunded 2335 portion of the reserve funding amount required by this paragraph 2336 and the most recent structural integrity reserve study. Funding 2337 from the line of credit or loans must be immediately available 2338 for access by the board to fund required repair, maintenance, or 2339 replacement expenses without further approval by the members of 2340 the association. A special assessment, a line of credit, or a 2341 loan secured under this sub-subparagraph and related details 2342 must be included in the annual financial statement required 2343 under s. 719.104(4) to be delivered to unit owners and required 2344 under s. 719.503 s. 718.503 to be provided to prospective 2345 purchasers of a unit. 2346 b.âFor a budget adopted on or before December 31, 2028, if 2347 the association has completed a milestone inspection pursuant to 2348 s. 553.899 within the previous 2 calendar years, the board, upon 2349 the approval of a majority of the total voting interests of the 2350 association, may temporarily pause, for a period of no more than 2351 two consecutive annual budgets, reserve fund contributions or 2352 reduce the amount of reserve funding for the purpose of funding 2353 repairs recommended by the milestone inspection. This sub 2354 subparagraph does not apply to a developer-controlled 2355 association and an association in which the nondeveloper unit 2356 owners have been in control for less than 1 year. An association 2357 that has paused reserve contributions under this sub 2358 subparagraph must have a structural integrity reserve study 2359 performed before the continuation of reserve contributions in 2360 order to determine the associationâs reserve funding needs and 2361 to recommend a reserve funding plan. 2362 4.âReserve funds and any interest accruing thereon shall 2363 remain in the reserve account or accounts, and shall be used 2364 only for authorized reserve expenditures unless their use for 2365 other purposes is approved in advance by a vote of the majority 2366 of the total voting interests of the association. Before 2367 turnover of control of an association by a developer to unit 2368 owners other than the developer under s. 719.301, the developer 2369 may not vote to use reserves for purposes other than that for 2370 which they were intended. For a budget adopted on or after 2371 December 31, 2024, members of a unit-owner-controlled 2372 association that must obtain a structural integrity reserve 2373 study may not vote to use reserve funds, or any interest 2374 accruing thereon, for purposes other than the replacement or 2375 deferred maintenance costs of the components listed in paragraph 2376 (k). 2377 5.âAn associationâs reserve accounts may be pooled for two 2378 or more required components. Reserve funding for components 2379 identified in paragraph (k) (g) may only be pooled with other 2380 components identified in paragraph (k) (g). The reserve funding 2381 indicated in the proposed annual budget must be sufficient to 2382 ensure that available funds meet or exceed projected expenses 2383 for all components in the reserve pool based on the reserve 2384 funding plan or schedule of the most recent structural integrity 2385 reserve study. A vote of the members is not required for the 2386 board to change the accounting method for reserves to a pooling 2387 accounting method or a straight-line accounting method. 2388 6.âThe division shall annually adjust for inflation, based 2389 on the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers released in 2390 January of each year, the minimum $25,000 threshold amount for 2391 required reserves. By February 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, 2392 the division must conspicuously post on its website the 2393 inflation-adjusted minimum threshold amount for required 2394 reserves. 2395 Reviserâs note.âAmended to correct cross-references to conform 2396 to context. Paragraph (g) relates to common expenses; 2397 paragraph (k) requires structural integrity reserve 2398 studies. Section 718.503 relates to disclosure prior to 2399 sale of residential condominiums; s. 719.503 relates to 2400 disclosure prior to sale of residential cooperatives. 2401 Section 47.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 2402 720.303, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2403 720.303âAssociation powers and duties; meetings of board; 2404 official records; budgets; financial reporting; association 2405 funds; recalls.â 2406 (4)âOFFICIAL RECORDS.â 2407 (b)1.âBy January 1, 2025, an association that has 100 or 2408 more parcels shall post the following documents on its website 2409 or make available such documents through an application that can 2410 be downloaded on a mobile device: 2411 a.âThe articles of incorporation of the association and 2412 each amendment thereto. 2413 b.âThe recorded bylaws of the association and each 2414 amendment thereto. 2415 c.âThe declaration of covenants and a copy of each 2416 amendment thereto. 2417 d.âThe current rules of the association. 2418 e.âA list of all current executory contracts or documents 2419 to which the association is a party or under which the 2420 association or the parcel owners have an obligation or 2421 responsibility and, after bidding for the related materials, 2422 equipment, or services has closed, a list of bids received by 2423 the association within the past year. 2424 f.âThe annual budget required by subsection (6) and any 2425 proposed budget to be considered at the annual meeting. 2426 g.âThe financial report required by subsection (7) and any 2427 monthly income or expense statement to be considered at a 2428 meeting. 2429 h.âThe associationâs current insurance policies. 2430 i.âThe certification of each director as required by s. 2431 720.3033(1)(a). 2432 j.âAll contracts or transactions between the association 2433 and any director, officer, corporation, firm, or association 2434 that is not an affiliated homeownersâ association or any other 2435 entity in which a director of an association is also a director 2436 or an officer and has a financial interest. 2437 k.âAny contract or document regarding a conflict of 2438 interest or possible conflict of interest as provided in ss. 2439 468.436(2)(b)6. and 720.3033(2). 2440 l.âNotice of any scheduled meeting of members and the 2441 agenda for the meeting, as required by s. 720.306, at least 14 2442 days before such meeting. The notice must be posted in plain 2443 view on the homepage of the website or application, or on a 2444 separate subpage of the website or application labeled âNoticesâ 2445 which is conspicuously visible and linked from the homepage. The 2446 association shall also post on its website or application any 2447 document to be considered and voted on by the members during the 2448 meeting or any document listed on the meeting agenda at least 7 2449 days before the meeting at which such document or information 2450 within the document will be considered. 2451 m.âNotice of any board meeting, the agenda, and any other 2452 document required for such meeting as required by subsection (2) 2453 (3), which must be posted on the website or application no later 2454 than the date required for notice under subsection (2) (3). 2455 2.âThe associationâs website or application must be 2456 accessible through the Internet and must contain a subpage, web 2457 portal, or other protected electronic location that is 2458 inaccessible to the general public and accessible only to parcel 2459 owners and employees of the association. 2460 3.âUpon written request by a parcel owner, the association 2461 must provide the parcel owner with a username and password and 2462 access to the protected sections of the associationâs website or 2463 application which contains the official documents of the 2464 association. 2465 4.âThe association shall ensure that the information and 2466 records described in paragraph (5)(g), which are not allowed to 2467 be accessible to parcel owners, are not posted on the 2468 associationâs website or application. If protected information 2469 or information restricted from being accessible to parcel owners 2470 is included in documents that are required to be posted on the 2471 associationâs website or application, the association must 2472 ensure the information is redacted before posting the documents. 2473 Notwithstanding the foregoing, the association or its authorized 2474 agent is not liable for disclosing information that is protected 2475 or restricted under paragraph (5)(g) unless such disclosure was 2476 made with a knowing or intentional disregard of the protected or 2477 restricted nature of such information. 2478 Reviserâs note.âAmended to correct a cross-reference to conform 2479 to the fact that notice requirements are referenced in 2480 subsection (2). Subsection (3) relates to minutes of 2481 meetings. 2482 Section 48.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 2483 782.071, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2484 782.071âVehicular homicide.ââVehicular homicideâ is the 2485 killing of a human being, or the killing of an unborn child by 2486 any injury to the mother, caused by the operation of a motor 2487 vehicle by another in a reckless manner likely to cause the 2488 death of, or great bodily harm to, another. 2489 (1)âVehicular homicide is: 2490 (c)âA felony of the first degree, punishable as provided in 2491 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, if the person has a prior 2492 conviction under this section, s. 316.193(3)(c)3., s. 2493 327.35(3)(a)3.c. s. 327.35(3)(c)3., or s. 782.072. 2494 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution to 2495 conform to the redesignation of subunits in s. 327.35(3) by 2496 s. 6, ch. 2025-197, Laws of Florida. 2497 Section 49.âSubsection (3) of section 782.072, Florida 2498 Statutes, is amended to read: 2499 782.072âVessel homicide.â 2500 (3)âA felony of the first degree, punishable as provided in 2501 s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084, if the person has a prior 2502 conviction under this section, s. 316.193(3)(c)3., s. 2503 327.35(3)(a)3.c. s. 327.35(3)(c)3., or s. 782.071. 2504 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution to 2505 conform to the redesignation of subunits in s. 327.35(3) by 2506 s. 6, ch. 2025-197, Laws of Florida. 2507 Section 50.âParagraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (1) of 2508 section 790.052, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2509 790.052âCarrying of concealed firearms by; off-duty law 2510 enforcement officers, correctional officers, and correctional 2511 probation officers.â 2512 (1) 2513 (b)âAll persons holding an active certification from the 2514 Criminal Justice Standards and Training Commission as a law 2515 enforcement officers officer, a correctional officers officer, 2516 or a correctional probation officers officer as defined in s. 2517 943.10(1), (2), (3), (6), (7), (8), or (9) meet the definition 2518 of âqualified law enforcement officerâ in 18 U.S.C. s. 926B(c). 2519 (c)âAll persons who held an active certification from the 2520 Criminal Justice Standards and Training Commission as a law 2521 enforcement officers officer, correctional officers officer, or 2522 correctional probation officers officer as defined in s. 2523 943.10(1), (2), (3), (6), (7), (8), or (9), while working for an 2524 employing agency, as defined in s. 943.10(4), but have separated 2525 from service under the conditions set forth in 18 U.S.C. s. 2526 926C(c), meet the definition of âqualified retired law 2527 enforcement officer.â 2528 Reviserâs note.âAmended to provide contextual consistency and 2529 conform to context. 2530 Section 51.âParagraph (c) of subsection (4) of section 2531 823.11, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2532 823.11âDerelict and migrant vessels; relocation or removal; 2533 penalty.â 2534 (4) 2535 (c)âThe commission may establish a program to provide 2536 grants to local governments for the removal, storage, 2537 destruction, and disposal of derelict vessels or migrant vessels 2538 from the waters of this state. This grant funding may also be 2539 used for the removal, storage, destruction, and disposal of 2540 vessels declared a public nuisance pursuant to s. 327.73(1)(aa) 2541 or the derelict vessel prevention program established pursuant 2542 to s. 327.4107(6) s. 327.4107(7). The program must be funded 2543 from the Marine Resources Conservation Trust Fund or the Florida 2544 Coastal Protection Trust Fund. Notwithstanding s. 216.181(11), 2545 funds available for these grants may only be authorized by 2546 appropriations acts of the Legislature. In a given fiscal year, 2547 if all funds appropriated pursuant to this paragraph are not 2548 requested by and granted to local governments for the removal, 2549 storage, destruction, and disposal of derelict vessels, migrant 2550 vessels, or vessels declared a public nuisance pursuant to s. 2551 327.73(1)(aa) by the end of the third quarter, the Fish and 2552 Wildlife Conservation Commission may use the remainder of the 2553 funds to remove, store, destroy, and dispose of, or to pay 2554 private contractors to remove, store, destroy, and dispose of, 2555 derelict vessels, migrant vessels, or vessels declared a public 2556 nuisance pursuant to s. 327.73(1)(aa). The commission shall 2557 adopt by rule procedures for local governments to submit a grant 2558 application and criteria for allocating available funds. Such 2559 criteria must include, at a minimum, all of the following: 2560 1.âThe number of derelict vessels and migrant vessels 2561 within the jurisdiction of the applicant. 2562 2.âThe threat posed by such vessels to public health or 2563 safety, the environment, navigation, or the aesthetic condition 2564 of the general vicinity. 2565 3.âThe degree of commitment of the local government to 2566 maintain waters free of abandoned, derelict, and migrant vessels 2567 and to seek legal action against those who abandon vessels in 2568 the waters of this state as defined in s. 327.02. 2569 Reviserâs note.âAmended to correct a cross-reference to conform 2570 to the redesignation of subunits in s. 327.4107 by s. 2, 2571 ch. 2025-147, Laws of Florida. 2572 Section 52.âParagraph (f) of subsection (8) of section 2573 836.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2574 836.13âAltered sexual depictions; prohibited acts; 2575 penalties; applicability.â 2576 (8) 2577 (f)âIn addition to the remedies under subsection (7) (5), a 2578 failure to reasonably comply with the notice and removal 2579 obligations under this subsection shall be treated as an unfair 2580 or a deceptive act or practice under part II of chapter 501, and 2581 the person or entity responsible shall be subject to the 2582 penalties and remedies provided in part II of chapter 501. 2583 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution to 2584 conform to the redesignation of subunits by s. 3, ch. 2025 2585 99, Laws of Florida. 2586 Section 53.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 2587 893.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2588 893.03âStandards and schedules.âThe substances enumerated 2589 in this section are controlled by this chapter. The controlled 2590 substances listed or to be listed in Schedules I, II, III, IV, 2591 and V are included by whatever official, common, usual, 2592 chemical, trade name, or class designated. The provisions of 2593 this section shall not be construed to include within any of the 2594 schedules contained in this section any excluded drugs listed 2595 within the purview of 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.22, styled âExcluded 2596 Substancesâ; 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.24, styled âExempt Chemical 2597 Preparationsâ; 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.32, styled âExempted 2598 Prescription Productsâ; or 21 C.F.R. s. 1308.34, styled âExempt 2599 Anabolic Steroid Products.â 2600 (4)âSCHEDULE IV.â 2601 (b)âUnless specifically excepted or unless listed in 2602 another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or 2603 preparation which contains any quantity of the following 2604 substances, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers 2605 whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of 2606 isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation, 2607 are controlled in Schedule IV: 2608 1.âAlfaxalone. 2609 2.âAlprazolam. 2610 3.âBarbital. 2611 4.âBromazepam. 2612 5.âButorphanol tartrate. 2613 6.âCamazepam. 2614 7.âCarisoprodol. 2615 8.âCathine. 2616 9.âChloral betaine. 2617 10.âChloral hydrate. 2618 11.âChlordiazepoxide. 2619 12.âClobazam. 2620 13.âClonazepam. 2621 14.âClorazepate. 2622 15.âClotiazepam. 2623 16.âCloxazolam. 2624 17.âDexfenfluramine. 2625 18.âDelorazepam. 2626 19.âDichloralphenazone. 2627 20.âDiazepam. 2628 21.âDiethylpropion. 2629 22.âEluxadoline. 2630 23.âEstazolam. 2631 24.âEszopiclone. 2632 25.âEthchlorvynol. 2633 26.âEthinamate. 2634 27.âEthyl loflazepate. 2635 28.âFencamfamin. 2636 29.âFenfluramine. 2637 30.âFenproporex. 2638 30.31.âFludiazepam. 2639 31.32.âFlurazepam. 2640 32.33.âFospropofol. 2641 33.34.âHalazepam. 2642 34.35.âHaloxazolam. 2643 35.36.âKetazolam. 2644 36.37.âLoprazolam. 2645 37.38.âLorazepam. 2646 38.39.âLorcaserin. 2647 39.40.âLormetazepam. 2648 40.41.âMazindol. 2649 41.42.âMebutamate. 2650 42.43.âMedazepam. 2651 43.44.âMefenorex. 2652 44.45.âMeprobamate. 2653 45.46.âMethohexital. 2654 46.47.âMethylphenobarbital. 2655 47.48.âMidazolam. 2656 48.49.âModafinil. 2657 49.50.âNimetazepam. 2658 50.51.âNitrazepam. 2659 51.52.âNordiazepam. 2660 52.53.âOxazepam. 2661 53.54.âOxazolam. 2662 54.55.âParaldehyde. 2663 55.56.âPemoline. 2664 56.57.âPentazocine. 2665 57.58.âPetrichloral. 2666 58.59.âPhenobarbital. 2667 59.60.âPhentermine. 2668 60.61.âPinazepam. 2669 61.62.âPipradrol. 2670 62.63.âPrazepam. 2671 63.64.âPropoxyphene (dosage forms). 2672 64.65.âPropylhexedrine, excluding any patent or proprietary 2673 preparation containing propylhexedrine, unless otherwise 2674 provided by federal law. 2675 65.66.âQuazepam. 2676 66.67.âSibutramine. 2677 67.68.âSPA[(-)-1 dimethylamino-1, 2 diphenylethane]. 2678 68.69.âSuvorexant. 2679 69.70.âTemazepam. 2680 70.71.âTetrazepam. 2681 71.72.âTramadol. 2682 72.73.âTriazolam. 2683 73.74.âZaleplon. 2684 74.75.âZolpidem. 2685 75.76.âZopiclone. 2686 76.77.âNot more than 1 milligram of difenoxin and not less 2687 than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit. 2688 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to s. 5, ch. 97-1, Laws of 2689 Florida, which repealed paragraph (4)(w), redesignated as 2690 subparagraph (4)(b)29. by s. 8, ch. 2018-3, Laws of 2691 Florida, effective upon the removal of fenfluramine from 2692 the schedules of controlled substances in 21 C.F.R. s. 2693 1308. The Drug Enforcement Administration, United States 2694 Department of Justice, in FR Doc. 2022-27400, filed 2695 December 22, 2022, issued a final rule removing 2696 fenfluramine from the schedules of the Controlled 2697 Substances Act, effective December 23, 2022. 2698 Section 54.âSubsection (1) of section 914.27, Florida 2699 Statutes, is amended to read: 2700 914.27âConfidentiality of victim and witness information.â 2701 (1)âInformation held by any state or local law enforcement 2702 agency, any state attorney, the statewide prosecutor, or the 2703 Department of Law Enforcement which discloses: 2704 (a)âThe identity or location of a victim or witness who has 2705 been identified or certified for protective or relocation 2706 services pursuant to s. 914.25; 2707 (b)âThe identity or location of an immediate family member 2708 of a victim or witness who has been identified or certified 2709 pursuant to s. 914.25; 2710 (c)âRelocation sites, techniques, or procedures utilized or 2711 developed as a result of the victim and witness protective 2712 services afforded by s. 914.25; or 2713 (d)âThe identity or relocation site of any victim, witness, 2714 or immediate family member of a victim or witness who has made a 2715 relocation of permanent residence by reason of the victimâs or 2716 witnessâs involvement in the investigation or prosecution giving 2717 rise to certification for protective or relocation services 2718 pursuant to s. 914.25; 2719 2720 is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. 2721 I of the State Constitution. Such information may be shared by 2722 law enforcement agencies, state attorneys, and the statewide 2723 prosecutor to facilitate the protective or relocation services 2724 provided pursuant to s. 914.25 and to support the prosecution 2725 efforts of the state attorneys and the statewide prosecutor. Any 2726 information so shared must remain confidential and exempt in the 2727 hands of any agency or entity to which the information is 2728 provided. 2729 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial insertion to 2730 improve clarity. 2731 Section 55.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 2732 916.111, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2733 916.111âTraining of mental health experts.âThe evaluation 2734 of defendants for competency to proceed or for sanity at the 2735 time of the commission of the offense shall be conducted in such 2736 a way as to ensure uniform application of the criteria 2737 enumerated in Rules 3.210 and 3.216, Florida Rules of Criminal 2738 Procedure. The department shall develop, and may contract with 2739 accredited institutions: 2740 (1)âTo provide: 2741 (c)âTraining for mental health professionals in the 2742 application of these protocols and procedures in performing 2743 forensic evaluations and providing reports to the courts. 2744 Training must include, but is not limited to, information on 2745 statutes and rules related to competency restoration, evidence 2746 based practices, and least restrictive treatment alternatives 2747 and placement options as described in s. 916.12(4)(c); and 2748 Reviserâs note.âAmended to improve clarity and facilitate 2749 correct interpretation. Section 916.12(4)(c) references 2750 both treatment alternatives and placement options. 2751 Section 56.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 2752 916.115, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2753 916.115âAppointment of experts.â 2754 (1)âThe court shall appoint no more than three experts to 2755 determine the mental condition of a defendant in a criminal 2756 case, including competency to proceed, insanity, involuntary 2757 placement, and treatment. The experts may evaluate the defendant 2758 in jail or in another appropriate local facility or in a 2759 facility of the Department of Corrections. 2760 (a)âEach The court-appointed expert experts shall: 2761 1.âBe a psychiatrist, licensed psychologist, or physician. 2762 2.âHave completed initial and annual forensic evaluator 2763 training, provided by the department. 2764 3.âIf performing juvenile evaluations, have completed 2765 initial and annual juvenile forensic competency evaluation 2766 training provided by the department. 2767 Reviserâs note.âAmended to improve sentence structure. 2768 Section 57.âParagraph (i) of subsection (3) of section 2769 921.0022, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2770 921.0022âCriminal Punishment Code; offense severity ranking 2771 chart.â 2772 (3)âOFFENSE SEVERITY RANKING CHART 2773 (i)âLEVEL 9 2774 2775 FloridaStatute FelonyDegree Description 2776 316.193â(3)(c)3.b. 1st DUI manslaughter; failing to render aid or give information. 2777 316.193â(3)(c)3.c. 1st DUI manslaughter; prior conviction for DUI manslaughter, BUI manslaughter, vehicular homicide, or vessel homicide. 2778 327.35â(3)(a)3.c.(II) 1st BUI manslaughter; failing to render aid or give information. 2779 327.35â(3)(a)3.c.(III) 327.35(3)(c)3.c. 1st BUI manslaughter; prior conviction for DUI manslaughter, BUI manslaughter, vehicular homicide, or vessel homicide. 2780 409.920â(2)(b)1.c. 1st Medicaid provider fraud; $50,000 or more. 2781 499.0051(8) 1st Knowing sale or purchase of contraband prescription drugs resulting in great bodily harm. 2782 560.123(8)(b)3. 1st Failure to report currency or payment instruments totaling or exceeding $100,000 by money transmitter. 2783 560.125(5)(c) 1st Money transmitter business by unauthorized person, currency, or payment instruments totaling or exceeding $100,000. 2784 655.50(10)(b)3. 1st Failure to report financial transactions totaling or exceeding $100,000 by financial institution. 2785 775.0844 1st Aggravated white collar crime. 2786 782.04(1) 1st Attempt, conspire, or solicit to commit premeditated murder. 2787 782.04(3) 1st,PBL Accomplice to murder in connection with arson, sexual battery, robbery, burglary, aggravated fleeing or eluding with serious bodily injury or death, and other specified felonies. 2788 782.051(1) 1st Attempted felony murder while perpetrating or attempting to perpetrate a felony enumerated in s. 782.04(3). 2789 782.07(2) 1st Aggravated manslaughter of an elderly person or disabled adult. 2790 787.01(1)(a)1. 1st,PBL Kidnapping; hold for ransom or reward or as a shield or hostage. 2791 787.01(1)(a)2. 1st,PBL Kidnapping with intent to commit or facilitate commission of any felony. 2792 787.01(1)(a)4. 1st,PBL Kidnapping with intent to interfere with performance of any governmental or political function. 2793 787.02(3)(a) 1st,PBL False imprisonment; child under age 13; perpetrator also commits aggravated child abuse, sexual battery, or lewd or lascivious battery, molestation, conduct, or exhibition. 2794 787.06(3)(c)1. 1st Human trafficking for labor and services of an unauthorized alien child. 2795 787.06(3)(d) 1st Human trafficking using coercion for commercial sexual activity of an unauthorized adult alien. 2796 787.06(3)(f)1. 1st,PBL Human trafficking for commercial sexual activity by the transfer or transport of any child from outside Florida to within the state. 2797 790.161 1st Attempted capital destructive device offense. 2798 790.166(2) 1st,PBL Possessing, selling, using, or attempting to use a weapon of mass destruction. 2799 794.011(2) 1st Attempted sexual battery; victim less than 12 years of age. 2800 794.011(2) Life Sexual battery; offender younger than 18 years and commits sexual battery on a person less than 12 years. 2801 794.011(4)(a) 1st,PBL Sexual battery, certain circumstances; victim 12 years of age or older but younger than 18 years; offender 18 years or older. 2802 794.011(4)(b) 1st Sexual battery, certain circumstances; victim and offender 18 years of age or older. 2803 794.011(4)(c) 1st Sexual battery, certain circumstances; victim 12 years of age or older; offender younger than 18 years. 2804 794.011(4)(d) 1st,PBL Sexual battery, certain circumstances; victim 12 years of age or older; prior conviction for specified sex offenses. 2805 794.011(8)(b) 1st,PBL Sexual battery; engage in sexual conduct with minor 12 to 18 years by person in familial or custodial authority. 2806 794.08(2) 1st Female genital mutilation; victim younger than 18 years of age. 2807 800.04(5)(b) Life Lewd or lascivious molestation; victim less than 12 years; offender 18 years or older. 2808 812.13(2)(a) 1st,PBL Robbery with firearm or other deadly weapon. 2809 812.133(2)(a) 1st,PBL Carjacking; firearm or other deadly weapon. 2810 812.135(2)(b) 1st Home-invasion robbery with weapon. 2811 817.535(3)(b) 1st Filing false lien or other unauthorized document; second or subsequent offense; property owner is a public officer or employee. 2812 817.535(4)(a)2. 1st Filing false claim or other unauthorized document; defendant is incarcerated or under supervision. 2813 817.535(5)(b) 1st Filing false lien or other unauthorized document; second or subsequent offense; owner of the property incurs financial loss as a result of the false instrument. 2814 817.568(7) 2nd,PBL Fraudulent use of personal identification information of an individual under the age of 18 by his or her parent, legal guardian, or person exercising custodial authority. 2815 827.03(2)(a) 1st Aggravated child abuse. 2816 847.0145(1) 1st Selling, or otherwise transferring custody or control, of a minor. 2817 847.0145(2) 1st Purchasing, or otherwise obtaining custody or control, of a minor. 2818 859.01 1st Poisoning or introducing bacteria, radioactive materials, viruses, or chemical compounds into food, drink, medicine, or water with intent to kill or injure another person. 2819 893.135 1st Attempted capital trafficking offense. 2820 893.135(1)(a)3. 1st Trafficking in cannabis, more than 10,000 lbs. 2821 893.135â(1)(b)1.c. 1st Trafficking in cocaine, more than 400 grams, less than 150 kilograms. 2822 893.135â(1)(c)1.c. 1st Trafficking in illegal drugs, more than 28 grams, less than 30 kilograms. 2823 893.135â(1)(c)2.d. 1st Trafficking in hydrocodone, 300 grams or more, less than 30 kilograms. 2824 893.135â(1)(c)3.d. 1st Trafficking in oxycodone, 100 grams or more, less than 30 kilograms. 2825 893.135â(1)(c)4.b.(III) 1st Trafficking in fentanyl, 28 grams or more. 2826 893.135â(1)(d)1.c. 1st Trafficking in phencyclidine, 400 grams or more. 2827 893.135â(1)(e)1.c. 1st Trafficking in methaqualone, 25 kilograms or more. 2828 893.135â(1)(f)1.c. 1st Trafficking in amphetamine, 200 grams or more. 2829 893.135â(1)(h)1.c. 1st Trafficking in gamma-hydroxybutyric acid (GHB), 10 kilograms or more. 2830 893.135â(1)(j)1.c. 1st Trafficking in 1,4-Butanediol, 10 kilograms or more. 2831 893.135â(1)(k)2.c. 1st Trafficking in Phenethylamines, 400 grams or more. 2832 893.135â(1)(m)2.d. 1st Trafficking in synthetic cannabinoids, 30 kilograms or more. 2833 893.135â(1)(n)2.c. 1st Trafficking in n-benzyl phenethylamines, 200 grams or more. 2834 896.101(5)(c) 1st Money laundering, financial instruments totaling or exceeding $100,000. 2835 896.104(4)(a)3. 1st Structuring transactions to evade reporting or registration requirements, financial transactions totaling or exceeding $100,000. 2836 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution to 2837 conform to the redesignation of subunits in s. 327.35(3) by 2838 s. 6, ch. 2025-197, Laws of Florida. 2839 Section 58.âSubsection (6) of section 934.255, Florida 2840 Statutes, is amended to read: 2841 934.255âSubpoenas in investigations of sexual offenses.â 2842 (6)âAn investigative or law enforcement officer who obtains 2843 a subpoena pursuant to paragraph (2)(c) may delay the 2844 notification required under that paragraph for a period not to 2845 exceed 180 days upon the execution of a written certification of 2846 a supervisory official that there is reason to believe that that 2847 notification of the existence of the subpoena may have an 2848 adverse result described in subsection (7). 2849 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial deletion to 2850 remove duplicative language. 2851 Section 59.âParagraph (c) of subsection (7) of section 2852 945.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2853 945.42âDefinitions; ss. 945.40-945.49.âAs used in ss. 2854 945.40-945.49, the following terms shall have the meanings 2855 ascribed to them, unless the context shall clearly indicate 2856 otherwise: 2857 (7)ââIn need of care and treatmentâ means that an inmate 2858 has a mental illness for which inpatient services in a mental 2859 health treatment facility are necessary and because of the 2860 mental illness: 2861 (c)âThe inmate is unable to determine for himself or 2862 herself whether placement is necessary.; and 2863 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to punctuation elsewhere in 2864 the subsection. As amended by s. 9, ch. 2025-81, Laws of 2865 Florida, paragraphs (7)(a), (b), and (d) end in periods. 2866 Section 60.âSubsection (2) and paragraph (a) of subsection 2867 (3) of section 945.485, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2868 945.485âManagement and treatment for self-injurious 2869 behaviors.â 2870 (2)âIn accordance with s. 945.6402 s. 945.6042, the 2871 Legislature finds that an inmate retains the fundamental right 2872 of self-determination regarding decisions pertaining to his or 2873 her own health, including the right to choose or refuse medical 2874 treatment or life-saving medical procedures. However, the 2875 inmateâs right to privacy and decisionmaking regarding medical 2876 treatment may be outweighed by compelling state interests. 2877 (3)âWhen an inmate is engaging in active or ongoing self 2878 injurious behavior and has refused to provide express and 2879 informed consent for treatment related to the self-injurious 2880 behavior, the warden of the facility where the inmate is housed 2881 shall consult with the inmateâs treating physician regarding the 2882 inmateâs medical and mental health status, current medical and 2883 mental health treatment needs, and competency to provide express 2884 and informed consent for treatment. The warden shall also 2885 determine whether the inmateâs self-injurious behavior presents 2886 a danger to the safety of department staff or other inmates or 2887 the security, internal order, or discipline of the institution. 2888 (a)âIf the inmateâs treating physician determines that the 2889 inmate has a mental illness and is incompetent to consent to 2890 treatment, the physician shall proceed in accordance with s. 2891 945.6402 s. 945.6042 for any necessary surgical or medical 2892 services. If the inmate is in need of care and treatment as 2893 defined in s. 945.42, the inmate shall be referred to a mental 2894 health treatment facility for an involuntary examination in 2895 accordance with s. 945.44. 2896 Reviserâs note.âAmended to correct a transposition error. 2897 Section 945.6402 relates to inmate health care advance 2898 directives. Section 945.6042 does not exist. 2899 Section 61.âSubsection (2) of section 951.27, Florida 2900 Statutes, is amended to read: 2901 951.27âBlood tests of inmates.â 2902 (2)âExcept as otherwise provided in this subsection, 2903 serologic blood test results obtained pursuant to subsection (1) 2904 are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. 2905 I of the State Constitution. However, it is not unlawful for the 2906 person receiving the test results to divulge the test results to 2907 the sheriff or chief correctional officer. Such test results 2908 must also be provided to employees or officers of the sheriff or 2909 chief correctional officer who are responsible for the custody 2910 and care of the affected inmate and have a need to know such 2911 information, to any person who provided a notice of exposure 2912 under subsection (4), and as provided in ss. 775.0877 and 2913 960.003. In addition, upon request of the victim or the victimâs 2914 legal guardian, or the parent or legal guardian of the victim if 2915 the victim is a minor, the results of any HIV test performed on 2916 an inmate arrested for any sexual offense involving oral, anal, 2917 or female genital penetration by, or union with, the sexual 2918 organ of another, must be disclosed to the victim or the 2919 victimâs legal guardian, or to the parent or legal guardian of 2920 the victim if the victim is a minor. In such cases, the county 2921 or municipal detention facility shall furnish the test results 2922 to the Department of Health, which is responsible for disclosing 2923 the results to public health agencies as provided in s. 775.0877 2924 and to the victim or the victimâs legal guardian, or the parent 2925 or legal guardian of the victim if the victim is a minor, as 2926 provided in s. 960.003(3). As used in this subsection, the term 2927 âfemale genitalsâ includes the labia minora, labia majora, 2928 clitoris, vulva, hymen, and vagina. 2929 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial insertion to 2930 improve clarity. 2931 Section 62.âSubsection (14) of section 984.151, Florida 2932 Statutes, is amended to read: 2933 984.151âEarly truancy intervention; truancy petition; 2934 judgment.â 2935 (14)âAny truant student who that meets the definition of a 2936 child in need of services and who has been found in contempt for 2937 violation of a court order under s. 984.09 two or more times 2938 shall be referred to the case staffing committee under s. 984.12 2939 with a recommendation to file a petition for a child in need of 2940 services. 2941 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial substitution to 2942 conform to context. 2943 Section 63.âSubsection (2) of section 984.19, Florida 2944 Statutes, is amended to read: 2945 984.19âMedical screening and treatment of child; 2946 examination of parent, legal guardian, or person requesting 2947 custody.â 2948 (2)âWhen the medical screening authorized by subsection (1) 2949 is performed or when it is otherwise determined by a licensed 2950 health care professional that a child is in need of medical 2951 treatment, consent for medical treatment shall be obtained in 2952 the following manner: 2953 (a)1.âConsent to medical treatment shall be obtained from a 2954 parent, legal guardian, or custodian of the child; or 2955 2.âA court order for such treatment shall be obtained. 2956 (b)âIf a parent, legal guardian, or custodian of the child 2957 is unavailable and his or her whereabouts cannot be reasonably 2958 ascertained, and it is after normal working hours so that a 2959 court order cannot reasonably be obtained, an authorized agent 2960 of the department or its provider has the authority to consent 2961 to necessary medical treatment for the child. The authority of 2962 the department to consent to medical treatment in this 2963 circumstance is limited to the time reasonably necessary to 2964 obtain court authorization. 2965 (c)âIf a parent, legal guardian, or custodian of the child 2966 is available but refuses to consent to the necessary treatment, 2967 a court order is required, unless the situation meets the 2968 definition of an emergency in s. 743.064 or the treatment needed 2969 is related to suspected abuse or neglect of the child by the 2970 parent or guardian. In such case, the departmentâs authorized 2971 agent may consent to necessary medical treatment. This authority 2972 is limited to the time reasonably necessary to obtain court 2973 authorization. 2974 2975 In no case may the department consent to sterilization, 2976 abortion, or termination of life support. 2977 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial insertion to 2978 improve clarity. 2979 Section 64.âSubsection (1) of section 984.21, Florida 2980 Statutes, is amended to read: 2981 984.21âOrders of adjudication.â 2982 (1)âAn order of adjudication by a court that a child is a 2983 child in need of services is a civil adjudication, and is not be 2984 deemed a conviction, nor shall the child be deemed to have been 2985 found guilty or to be a delinquent or criminal by reason of 2986 adjudication, nor shall that adjudication operate to impose upon 2987 the child any of the civil disabilities ordinarily imposed by or 2988 resulting from conviction or disqualify or prejudice the child 2989 in any civil service application or appointment. 2990 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm an editorial deletion to 2991 improve clarity. 2992 Section 65.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 2993 1003.27, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2994 1003.27âCourt procedure and penalties.âThe court procedure 2995 and penalties for the enforcement of the provisions of this 2996 part, relating to compulsory school attendance, shall be as 2997 follows: 2998 (2)âNONENROLLMENT AND NONATTENDANCE CASES.â 2999 (c)âThe district school superintendent must provide the 3000 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles the legal name, 3001 sex, date of birth, and social security number of each minor 3002 student who has been reported under this paragraph and who fails 3003 to otherwise satisfy the requirements of s. 322.091. The 3004 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles may not issue a 3005 driver license or learnerâs driver license to, and shall suspend 3006 any previously issued driver license or learnerâs driver license 3007 of, any such minor student, pursuant to s. 322.091. 3008 Reviserâs note.âAmended to confirm the editorial reinsertion of 3009 the word âtoâ as stricken by s. 32, ch. 2025-153, Laws of 3010 Florida, to improve clarity. 3011 Section 66.âParagraph (b) of subsection (6) of section 3012 1008.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3013 1008.25âPublic school student progression; student support; 3014 coordinated screening and progress monitoring; reporting 3015 requirements.â 3016 (6)âMATHEMATICS DEFICIENCY AND PARENTAL NOTIFICATION.â 3017 (b)âA Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program student 3018 who exhibits a substantial deficiency in early math skills based 3019 upon the results of the administration of the midyear or final 3020 coordinated screening and progress monitoring under subsection 3021 (9) (8) shall be referred to the local school district and may 3022 be eligible to receive intensive mathematics interventions 3023 before participating in kindergarten. 3024 Reviserâs note.âAmended to correct a cross-reference to conform 3025 to context. Subsection (8) relates to successful 3026 progression for retained third grade students; subsection 3027 (9) relates to a coordinated screening and progress 3028 monitoring system. 3029 Section 67.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 3030 1011.61, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3031 1011.61âDefinitions.âNotwithstanding the provisions of s. 3032 1000.21, the following terms are defined as follows for the 3033 purposes of the Florida Education Finance Program: 3034 (1)âA âfull-time equivalent studentâ in each program of the 3035 district is defined in terms of full-time students and part-time 3036 students as follows: 3037 (c)1.âA âfull-time equivalent studentâ is: 3038 a.âA full-time student in any one of the programs listed in 3039 s. 1011.62(1)(c); or 3040 b.âA combination of full-time or part-time students in any 3041 one of the programs listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c) which is the 3042 equivalent of one full-time student based on the following 3043 calculations: 3044 (I)âA full-time student in a combination of programs listed 3045 in s. 1011.62(1)(c) shall be a fraction of a full-time 3046 equivalent membership in each special program equal to the 3047 number of net hours per school year for which he or she is a 3048 member, divided by the appropriate number of hours set forth in 3049 subparagraph (a)1. The difference between that fraction or sum 3050 of fractions and the maximum value as set forth in subsection 3051 (3) (4) for each full-time student is presumed to be the balance 3052 of the studentâs time not spent in a special program and shall 3053 be recorded as time in the appropriate basic program. 3054 (II)âA prekindergarten student with a disability shall meet 3055 the requirements specified for kindergarten students. 3056 (III)âA full-time equivalent student for students in 3057 kindergarten through grade 12 in a full-time virtual instruction 3058 program under s. 1002.45 or a virtual charter school under s. 3059 1002.33 shall consist of six full-credit completions or the 3060 prescribed level of content that counts toward promotion to the 3061 next grade in programs listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c). Credit 3062 completions may be a combination of full-credit courses or half 3063 credit courses. 3064 (IV)âA full-time equivalent student for students in 3065 kindergarten through grade 12 in a part-time virtual instruction 3066 program under s. 1002.45 shall consist of six full-credit 3067 completions in programs listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c)1. and 3. 3068 Credit completions may be a combination of full-credit courses 3069 or half-credit courses. 3070 (V)âA Florida Virtual School full-time equivalent student 3071 shall consist of six full-credit completions or the prescribed 3072 level of content that counts toward promotion to the next grade 3073 in the programs listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c)1. and 3. for students 3074 participating in kindergarten through grade 12 part-time virtual 3075 instruction and the programs listed in s. 1011.62(1)(c) for 3076 students participating in kindergarten through grade 12 full 3077 time virtual instruction. Credit completions may be a 3078 combination of full-credit courses or half-credit courses. 3079 (VI)âEach successfully completed full-credit course earned 3080 through an online course delivered by a district other than the 3081 one in which the student resides shall be calculated as 1/6 FTE. 3082 (VII)âA full-time equivalent student for courses requiring 3083 passage of a statewide, standardized end-of-course assessment 3084 under s. 1003.4282 to earn a standard high school diploma shall 3085 be defined and reported based on the number of instructional 3086 hours as provided in this subsection. 3087 (VIII)âFor students enrolled in a school district as a 3088 full-time student, the district may report 1/6 FTE for each 3089 student who passes a statewide, standardized end-of-course 3090 assessment without being enrolled in the corresponding course. 3091 2.âA student in membership in a program scheduled for more 3092 or less than 180 school days or the equivalent on an hourly 3093 basis as specified by rules of the State Board of Education is a 3094 fraction of a full-time equivalent membership equal to the 3095 number of instructional hours in membership divided by the 3096 appropriate number of hours set forth in subparagraph (a)1.; 3097 however, for the purposes of this subparagraph, membership in 3098 programs scheduled for more than 180 days is limited to students 3099 enrolled in: 3100 a.âJuvenile justice education programs. 3101 b.âThe Florida Virtual School. 3102 c.âVirtual instruction programs and virtual charter schools 3103 for the purpose of course completion and credit recovery 3104 pursuant to ss. 1002.45 and 1003.498. Course completion applies 3105 only to a student who is reported during the second or third 3106 membership surveys and who does not complete a virtual education 3107 course by the end of the regular school year. The course must be 3108 completed no later than the deadline for amending the final 3109 student enrollment survey for that year. Credit recovery applies 3110 only to a student who has unsuccessfully completed a traditional 3111 or virtual education course during the regular school year and 3112 must retake the course in order to be eligible to graduate with 3113 the studentâs class. 3114 3115 The full-time equivalent student enrollment calculated under 3116 this subsection is subject to the requirements in subsection 3117 (3). 3118 3119 The department shall determine and implement an equitable method 3120 of equivalent funding for schools operating under emergency 3121 conditions, which schools have been approved by the department 3122 to operate for less than the minimum term as provided in s. 3123 1011.60(2). 3124 Reviserâs note.âAmended to correct a cross-reference to conform 3125 to the redesignation of subunits in s. 1011.61 by s. 16, 3126 ch. 2025-203, Laws of Florida. 3127 Section 68.âParagraph (f) of subsection (2) of section 3128 1012.552, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3129 1012.552âThe Coaching for Educator Readiness and Teaching 3130 (CERT) Certification Program.â 3131 (2)âPROGRAM REQUIREMENTS.âA CERT program must include all 3132 of the following: 3133 (f)âProvide Guidance and on-the-job training in the 3134 classroom on mastering Florida Educator Accomplished Practices. 3135 Reviserâs note.âAmended to conform to context and improve 3136 clarity. 3137 Section 69.âThis act shall take effect on the 60th day 3138 after adjournment sine die of the session of the Legislature in 3139 which enacted.